Georgia, session 2025_26, SB153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
10 SECTION 1.
11 Reserved.
12 SECTION 2.
13 Title 2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to agriculture, is amended in:
S. B. 153
- 1 -

25 LC 39 4444
14 (1) Code Section 2-10-57, relating to authority of Commissioner to provide for safety and
15 security at farmers' markets and police powers, in the introductory language of
16 subparagraph (b)(1)(F), by replacing the semicolon with a colon.
17 SECTION 3.
18 Reserved.
19 SECTION 4.
20 Title 4 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to animals, is amended in:
21 (1) Code Section 4-11-3, relating to licenses for pet dealers and kennel, stable, or animal
22 shelter operators, requirement, issuance, and application, in paragraph (c.1)(4), by deleting
23 "and reserved".
24 SECTION 5.
25 Reserved.
26 SECTION 6.
27 Reserved.
28 SECTION 7.
29 Title 7 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to banking and finance, is
30 amended in:
31 (1) Code Section 7-1-612, which is reserved, by designating said Code section as repealed.
32 (2) Code Section 7-1-689, relating to record keeping, investigation and examination
33 requirements and powers, and limitations on civil liability, in the introductory language of
34 subsection (l), by replacing "website," with "public website," and in paragraph (l)(1), by
35 replacing "and telephone, facsimile," with "telephone number, facsimile number,".
S. B. 153
- 2 -

25 LC 39 4444
36 (3) Code Section 7-1-706, relating to record keeping, investigation and examination
37 requirements and powers, and limitation on civil liability, in the introductory language of
38 subsection (l), by replacing "website," with "public website," and in paragraph (l)(1), by
39 replacing "and telephone, facsimile," with "telephone number, facsimile number,".
40 (4) Code Section 7-1-1009, relating to record keeping, investigations and examinations, and
41 exemptions from civil liability, in the introductory language of subsection (g), by replacing
42 "website," with "public website," and in paragraph (g)(1), by replacing "and telephone," with
43 "telephone number,".
44 (5) Code Section 7-1-1011, relating to annual fees, in subsection (a), by replacing "mortgage
45 broker," with "a mortgage broker,".
46 (6) Code Section 7-1-1017, relating to suspension or revocation of licenses or mortgage
47 broker education approval, notice, judicial review, and effect on preexisting contract, in
48 subsection (b), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in" and by replacing "their"
49 with "his or her".
50 (7) Code Section 7-3-18, which is reserved, by designating said Code section as repealed.
51 (8) Code Section 7-9-8, relating to the issuance of certificate of incorporation or certificate
52 of organization, at the end of paragraph (3), by inserting a comma and in the undesignated
53 text at the end of the Code section, by replacing "name of" with "the name of".
54 (9) Code Section 7-9-11.8, relating to rights and remedies of shareholders, in subsection (a),
55 by replacing "known as the 'Georgia Business Corporation Code' or" with "the 'Georgia
56 Business Corporation Code,' or" and in paragraph (b)(1), by replacing "resulting acquirer"
57 with "resulting merchant acquirer".
58 SECTION 8.
59 Title 8 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to buildings and housing, is
60 amended in:
S. B. 153
- 3 -

25 LC 39 4444
61 (1) Code Section 8-3-311, relating to creation of stable housing accountability programs,
62 application process, minimum standards, approval criteria, and funding, in the introductory
63 language of subsection (d), by replacing "At minimum," with "At a minimum,", in
64 subparagraph (d)(6)(A), by replacing "U.S." with "United States", in subparagraph (d)(6)(E),
65 by replacing "heath" with "health", and in paragraph (e)(2), by replacing "their" with "his or
66 her".
67 (2) Code Section 8-3-312, relating to disbursements for operating expenses, by replacing
68 "provided the commission" with "provided to the commission".
69 SECTION 9.
70 Reserved.
71 SECTION 10.
72 Title 10 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to commerce and trade, is
73 amended in:
74 (1) Code Section 10-1-427, relating to false advertising of legal services, good faith
75 exemptions, investigation and enforcement by Attorney General, and penalties for violation
76 of cease and desist order, in paragraph (a)(3), by replacing "Internet search engine ad," with
77 "internet search engine advertisement,".
78 (2) Code Section 10-1-782, relating to definitions regarding the "Georgia Lemon Law," in
79 paragraph (23), by inserting "by" preceding "90,000".
80 (3) Code Section 10-4-111, relating to meetings of advisory board, duties, fixing opening
81 date of marketing season, and revocation of license for early sale, by repealing and reserving
82 said Code section.
83 (4) Article 7 of Chapter 6, which is reserved, by repealing said article.
S. B. 153
- 4 -

25 LC 39 4444
84 SECTION 11.
85 Reserved.
86 SECTION 12.
87 Reserved.
88 SECTION 13.
89 Reserved.
90 SECTION 14.
91 Reserved.
92 SECTION 15.
93 Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to courts, is amended in:
94 (1) Code Section 15-5B-12, as effective on July 1, 2026, relating to proceedings, filing
95 procedures, service, and scheduling, in subsection (f), by replacing "address of the of the"
96 with "address of the".
97 (2) Code Section 15-10-101, relating to eligibility of constables, in paragraph (a)(4), by
98 replacing "accredited high school diploma or general educational development (GED)" with
99 "approved high school equivalency (HSE)".
100 (3) Code Section 15-11-71, relating to juvenile treatment court divisions, in the introductory
101 language of paragraph (a)(3), by replacing "increase likelihood" with "increase the
102 likelihood" and in subsection (f), by replacing "may have the authority" with "shall be
103 authorized".
104 (4) Code Section 15-12-40.1, relating to state-wide master jury list, driver's license
105 information, list of registered voters, and random list of persons to comprise venire, in
106 subsection (b), by replacing "or personal identification card" with "or identification card"
S. B. 153
- 5 -

25 LC 39 4444
107 each time the phrase appears and by replacing "or a personal identification card" with "or an
108 identification card".
109 SECTION 16.
110 Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to crimes and offenses, is
111 amended in:
112 (1) Code Section 16-5-3.1, relating to aggravated involuntary manslaughter for fentanyl
113 overdose death, in paragraph (a)(3), by replacing "shall mean" with "means", in
114 paragraph (a)(4), by replacing "shall include" with "includes", and in subsection (c), by
115 replacing "10 years" with "ten years".
116 (2) Code Section 16-5-20, relating to simple assault, in subsections (c) and (f), by replacing
117 "For purposes of this Code section," with "As used in this Code section, the term", in the
118 undesignated text at the end of subsection (h), by replacing "For the purposes of" with "As
119 used in" and by replacing "homo sapiens" with "Homo sapiens", and in subsection (i), by
120 replacing "their" with "his or her".
121 (3) Code Section 16-5-21, relating to aggravated assault, in subsection (m), by replacing
122 "their" with "his or her".
123 (4) Code Section 16-5-23, relating to simple battery, in subsection (d), by replacing "For
124 purposes of this Code section," with "As used in this Code section, the term", in
125 subsection (i), by replacing "For purposes of this Code section, 'school property' shall
126 include" with "As used in this Code section, the term 'school property' includes", and in
127 subsection (j), by replacing "their" with "his or her".
128 (5) Code Section 16-5-23.1, relating to battery, in subsection (g), by replacing "For purposes
129 of this Code section," with "As used in this Code section, the term", in subsection (i), by
130 replacing "For purposes of this Code section, 'school property' shall include" with "As used
131 in this Code section, the term 'school property' includes", and in subsection (l), by replacing
132 "their" with "his or her".
S. B. 153
- 6 -

25 LC 39 4444
133 (6) Code Section 16-5-24, relating to aggravated battery, in subsection (i), by replacing
134 "their" with "his or her".
135 (7) Code Section 16-7-21.1, relating to unlawful squatting, by revising said Code section as
136 follows:
137 "16-7-21.1.
138 (a)(1) A person commits the offense of unlawful squatting when he or she enters upon
139 the land or premises of another and resides on such land or premises for any period of
140 time knowingly acting without the knowledge or consent of the owner, the rightful
141 occupant, or an authorized representative of the owner. As used in For purposes of this
142 Code section, the term 'resides' means to inhabit or live on or within any land or premises.
143 (2) Any person who commits or is accused of committing the offense of unlawful
144 squatting as provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall receive a citation
145 advising that they must he or she shall present to the head of the issuing law enforcement
146 agency or their designee its designee, within three business days of receiving the citation
147 for such alleged offense, properly executed documentation that authorizes the person's
148 entry on such land or premises. Such documentation may include a properly executed
149 lease or rental agreement or proof of rental payments.
150 (3) If such person is unable to provide the documentation required by paragraph (2) of
151 this subsection, such person shall be subject to arrest for unlawful squatting and, upon
152 conviction thereof, shall be subject to the penalty provided in subsection (b) of this Code
153 section.
154 (4) If such person does provide provides documentation that authorizes such person's
155 entry on the land or premises, a hearing shall be set within seven days of the submission
156 of such documentation, and, if the court of appropriate jurisdiction finds that the
157 submitted documentation was not properly executed or is not meritorious, such person
158 shall be subject to demand for possession and removal as provided in Code
159 Section 44-11-32, be subject to arrest and upon conviction penalties as provided for in
S. B. 153
- 7 -

25 LC 39 4444
160 Code Sections 16-9-1 and 16-9-2, and shall be assessed an additional fine based on the
161 fair market monthly rental rate of the land or premises.
162 (b) Any person who violates subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a
163 misdemeanor which upon conviction shall be punishable punished as provided in Code
164 Section 17-10-3."
165 (8) Code Section 16-7-23, relating to criminal damage to property in the second degree, in
166 paragraph (a)(2), by inserting a comma following "fireworks".
167 (9) Code Section 16-11-171, relating to definitions regarding Brady Law regulations, in
168 paragraph (4), by inserting "of Chapter 7" following "Article 6".
169 (10) Code Section 16-13-71, relating to dangerous drugs, by revising numerous paragraphs
170 in subsection (b), subparagraph (b)(59)(BB.5), and paragraph (c)(16.92) as follows:
171 "(57.5) Anthrax Vaccine Adsorbed vaccine adsorbed, Adjuvanted;"
172 "(BB.5) House Dust Mite Allergen Extract dust mite allergen extract;"
173 "(160.5) Chikungunya Vaccine vaccine, Live;"
174 "(206.7) Coagulation Factor X, (human) Human;"
175 "(247.4) Dengue Tetravalent Vaccine tetravalent vaccine, Live;"
176 "(317.3) Dornase Alpha alpha;"
177 "(328.3) Ebola Zaire Vaccine vaccine, Live;"
178 "(361.5) Reserved;"
179 "(383.15) Ferric Hexacyanoferrate hexacyanoferrate;"
180 "(386.3) Reserved;"
181 "(425) Gomenol Solution solution;"
182 "(433.5) Halobetasol Propionate propionate;"
183 "(446.2) Human Papillomavirus papillomavirus 9-valent Vaccine vaccine, Recombinant;"
184 "(509.7) Reserved;"
185 "(512.691) Reserved;"
186 "(529.93) Reserved;"
S. B. 153
- 8 -

25 LC 39 4444
187 "(703.43) Reserved;"
188 "(731.1) Reserved;"
189 "(732.9) Reserved;"
190 "(836.1) Respiratory Syncytial Virus Vaccine syncytial virus vaccine;"
191 "(851.02) Reserved;"
192 "(855.5) Sermorelin Acetate acetate;"
193 "(945.5) Reserved;"
194 "(1025.8) Varicella Virus Vaccine Live virus vaccine, Live;"
195 "(1037.23) Von von Willebrand factor;"
196 "(1042.8) Zoledronic Acid acid;"
197 "(1042.95) Zoster Vaccine Recombinant vaccine recombinant, Adjuvanted;"
198 "(16.92) Any opioid antagonist, as defined in Code Section 26-4-116.2, shall also be
199 exempt from subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section when used for drug overdose
200 prevention and when supplied by a dispenser or an authorized wholesale distributor.;".
201 (11) Code Section 16-13-122, relating to content of kratom and required labeling, in
202 paragraph (b)(1), by deleting "of".
203 SECTION 17.
204 Title 17 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to criminal procedure, is
205 amended in:
206 (1) Code Section 17-6-12, relating to unsecured judicial release, requirement, effect of
207 failure of person charged to appear for trial, and consideration of criminal record, in
208 subparagraph (a)(1)(GG), by replacing "Code Section 16-10-29;" with "Code
209 Section 16-10-24;".
210 (2) Code Section 17-10-7, relating to punishment of repeat offenders and punishment and
211 eligibility for parole of persons convicted of fourth felony offense, in subsection (e), by
212 replacing "recidivous" with "recidivist".
S. B. 153
- 9 -

25 LC 39 4444
213 SECTION 18.
214 Reserved.
215 SECTION 19.
216 Title 19 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to domestic relations, is
217 amended in:
218 (1) Code Section 19-6-9, relating to voluntary separation, abandonment, or driving off of
219 spouse and equity may compel support, by deleting "and as may be".
220 (2) Code Section 19-6-32, relating to entering income withholding order or medical support
221 notice for award of child support, when order or notice effective, and hearing on order, in
222 paragraph (a)(2), by replacing "means judge" with "means a judge" and in paragraph (a)(5),
223 by replacing "42 U.S.C. Section 666(b)(A)(I) and (ii)" with "42 U.S.C.
224 Section 666(b)(6)(A)(i) and (ii)".
225 (3) Code Section 19-6-33, relating to notice and service of income withholding order,
226 hearing on enforcement of order, discharge of obligor, and penalties, in paragraph (a)(2), by
227 replacing "means judge" with "means a judge".
228 (4) Code Section 19-6-33.1, relating to family support registry, in subparagraph (e)(2)(A),
229 by replacing "arrears or" with "arrears, or".
230 SECTION 20.
231 Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education, is amended in:
232 (1) Code Section 20-2-37, which is reserved, by designating said Code section as repealed.
233 (2) Code Section 20-2-38, which is reserved, by designating said Code section as repealed.
234 (3) Code Section 20-2-167.1, relating to public meetings on proposed annual operating
235 budget, notice, electronic copies, and exception for certain nonprofits, in paragraph (a)(2),
236 by replacing "system and," with "system,".
S. B. 153
- 10 -

25 LC 39 4444
237 (4) Code Section 20-2-751.4, as effective on July 1, 2025, relating to policies prohibiting
238 bullying and cyberbullying required, enforcement of policies including assignment to
239 alternative school, notice, antibullying training programs and materials, limitation of liability,
240 and noncompliance, by revising the introductory language of subparagraph (1)(A) as follows:
241 "(1)(A) 'Bullying' Bullying' ' means an act that is:"
242 (5) Code Section 20-2-775, relating to automated external defibrillator required in high
243 schools, requirements, and funding, in subparagraph (c)(7)(D), by deleting the comma
244 following "leads".
245 (6) Code Section 20-2-776.5, relating to opioid antagonists, possession, administration,
246 obligations, and immunity from civil liability, at the end of subsection (g), by inserting a
247 period following "known".
248 (7) Article 1 of Chapter 3, relating to postsecondary education generally, by designating
249 Code Section 20-3-1, relating to definitions, as Part 1.
250 (8) Code Section 20-3-38, relating to agricultural extension work, in subsection (a), by
251 replacing "U.S.C.A." with "U.S.C.".
252 (9) Code Section 20-3-41.2, relating to surrender of materials to division for preservation,
253 preparation of certified copies, ownership, operation, and management of electronic archival
254 records, exemption for certain records under certain conditions, and "constitutional officer"
255 defined, in subsections (a) through (c), by inserting "of the University System of Georgia"
256 following "Division of Archives and History" each time the term appears.
257 (10) Code Section 20-3-41.3, relating to study of historical documents and public displays
258 of the Foundations of American Law and Government, in paragraph (a)(1), by inserting "of
259 the University System of Georgia" following "Division of Archives and History".
260 (11) Code Section 20-3-45, relating to Georgia Historical Records Advisory Council created,
261 purpose, members, expenses, coordinator, officers, meetings, administrative assignment, and
262 staff, in subsections (c) and (h), by replacing "the Division of Archives and History" with
263 "the division".
S. B. 153
- 11 -

25 LC 39 4444
264 (12) Code Section 20-3-45.1, relating to powers and duties of the Georgia Historical Records
265 Advisory Council, in paragraph (2), by replacing "the Division of Archives and History" with
266 "the division".
267 (13) Code Section 20-3-48, relating to short title, public forums designated, "free speech
268 zones" prohibited, allowed restrictions, protected expressive activity, construction, required
269 materials, and annual reporting, in paragraph (b)(5), by replacing "This term" with "Such
270 term" and in subsection (i), by replacing "their websites," with "their public websites,".
271 (14) Code Section 20-3-60, relating to when properties of university system may be sold,
272 leased, or otherwise disposed of, effect of restrictions on use, and works of art, in
273 subsection (a) and in the undesignated text at the end of paragraph (c)(2), by replacing
274 "however, that" with "however, that," and in paragraph (c)(1), by replacing "The term 'work
275 of art'" with "Such term" each time the phrase appears.
276 (15) Code Section 20-3-66, relating to determination of in-state resident status of students
277 for tuition or fees, in the undesignated text at the end of paragraph (a)(4), by replacing "the
278 term 'student from a homeless situation'" with "such term".
279 (16) Code Section 20-3-67, relating to powers of regents over system and institutions over
280 students not limited by lowering age of majority, by replacing "the system" with "the
281 university system".
282 (17) Code Section 20-3-92, relating to definitions regarding postsecondary education, in
283 paragraph (5), by replacing "The term" with "Such term" and by replacing "is recognized as
284 a student organization" with "are recognized as student organizations".
285 (18) Code Section 20-3-130, relating to short title regarding junior colleges and name of
286 junior college system, by replacing "shall be known as" with "shall be known and may be
287 cited as" each time the phrase appears.
288 (19) Code Section 20-3-131, relating to definitions regarding junior colleges, in
289 paragraph (2), by replacing "county school system, independent school system," with "local
290 school system,".
S. B. 153
- 12 -

25 LC 39 4444
291 (20) Code Section 20-3-132, relating to authority to establish and maintain junior colleges,
292 by replacing "county school system, independent school system," with "local school system,"
293 each time the phrase appears.
294 (21) Code Section 20-3-150, relating to short title regarding Georgia Education Authority
295 (University), by replacing "may be cited" with "shall be known and may be cited".
296 (22) Code Section 20-3-200, relating to short title regarding Private Colleges and
297 Universities Authority, by replacing "may be cited as" with "shall be known and may be cited
298 as".
299 (23) Code Section 20-3-201, relating to definitions regarding Private Colleges and
300 Universities Authority, in paragraph (4), by replacing "'Construction project' also means"
301 with "Such term also means" and by replacing "The term 'construction project' also means"
302 with "Such term also means", in paragraph (5), by replacing "the term 'cost,' as applied" with
303 "such term, as applied", and in paragraph (6) and divisions (7)(A)(i), (7)(A)(ii), and
304 (7)(A)(iv), by replacing "U.S.C.A." with "U.S.C.".
305 (24) Code Section 20-3-231, relating to legislative findings and purpose of Georgia Student
306 Finance Commission, in subsections (a) and (b), by deleting the internal catchlines.
307 (25) Code Section 20-3-234, relating to functions and composition of board of
308 commissioners, appointment, qualifications, and terms of commissioners, board officers,
309 meetings, committees, compensation, and advisory councils, in subsections (a) through (h),
310 by deleting the internal catchlines.
311 (26) Code Section 20-3-235, relating to commission officers, employees, and support
312 services, bonds, and legal services, in paragraphs (1) through (5), by deleting the internal
313 catchlines.
314 (27) Code Section 20-3-236, relating to powers and duties of commission, board of
315 commissioners, and officers, confidentiality, and repayments and refunds, in
316 paragraph (a)(1), by replacing "they" with "it" and by replacing "them" with "the board of
317 commissioners" and in paragraph (b)(2), by replacing "e-mail" with "email".
S. B. 153
- 13 -

25 LC 39 4444
318 (28) Code Section 20-3-242, relating to web based counseling and resources for students,
319 in paragraph (1), by replacing "web based" with "internet based" and in paragraph (2), by
320 replacing "a web based" with "an internet based".
321 (29) Code Section 20-3-250.2, relating to definitions regarding nonpublic postsecondary
322 educational institutions, in paragraph (11.1), by replacing "however, that" with "however,
323 that,".
324 (30) Code Section 20-3-250.3, relating to educational institutions exempted from application
325 of part, in the undesignated text at the end of subparagraph (a)(13)(B), by replacing "however
326 that" with "however, that" and in paragraph (a)(14), by replacing "associate" with
327 "associate's".
328 (31) Code Section 20-3-250.6, relating to minimum standards for educational institutions,
329 in paragraph (a)(4), by replacing "catalog" with "catalogue".
330 (32) Code Section 20-3-250.8, relating to application to operate or conduct postsecondary
331 activities, in subsection (a), by replacing "catalog" with "catalogue" and by replacing
332 "however, that" with "however, that," and in subsection (b), by replacing "catalogs," with
333 "catalogues,".
334 (33) Code Section 20-3-311, relating to legislative findings and purposes of authority, in
335 subsection (a), by deleting the internal catchline.
336 (34) Code Section 20-3-313, relating to authority created as successor to Georgia Higher
337 Education Assistance Authority and abolishment of Georgia Higher Education Assistance
338 Corporation, in the introductory language of subsection (c), by replacing "however:" with
339 "however, that:", in paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(2), by replacing "That educational" with
340 "Educational", and in paragraph (c)(3), by replacing "That all" with "All".
341 (35) Code Section 20-3-314, relating to functions, composition, organization, and conduct
342 of affairs of board of directors, in subsection (a), by deleting the internal catchline, in the
343 introductory language of subsection (b), by deleting the internal catchline and by replacing
344 "however:" with "however, that:", in paragraph (b)(1), by replacing "That nothing" with
S. B. 153
- 14 -

25 LC 39 4444
345 "Nothing", in paragraph (b)(2), by replacing "That no" with "No", and in paragraph (b)(3),
346 by replacing "That the" with "The".
347 (36) Code Section 20-3-316, relating to powers and duties of authority, employees'
348 functions, servicing of educational loans, registration with Selective Service System, and
349 confidentiality, in paragraph (b)(2), by replacing "e-mail" with "email".
350 (37) Code Section 20-3-329, relating to employees of commission transferred to authority,
351 status of authority employees hired after July 1, 1996, status of transferred employees, and
352 benefits of transferred employees not impaired, in subsection (c), by replacing "however,
353 that" with "however, that,".
354 (38) Code Section 20-3-373, relating to general loan fund, in the undesignated text at the end
355 of subsection (a), by replacing "fund to make" with "fund provided for in subsection (a) of
356 this Code section to make" and by redesignating such undesignated text as new
357 subsection (b) and by redesignating current subsection (b) as new subsection (c).
358 (39) Code Section 20-3-374, relating to service cancelable loan fund and authorized types
359 of service cancelable educational loans, in paragraphs (b)(1) through (b)(4), by deleting the
360 internal catchlines.
361 (40) Code Section 20-3-386, relating to distribution of education loan repayment assistance
362 and conditions, in subsection (d), by replacing "U.S.C.A." with "U.S.C.".
363 (41) Code Section 20-3-395, relating to definitions regarding direct loans to students on
364 basis of need and merit, in subparagraphs (3)(A), (3)(B), and (3)(C), by replacing "associate"
365 with "associate's" and in paragraph (6), by replacing "U.S.C.A." with "U.S.C.".
366 (42) Code Section 20-3-400.1, relating to definitions regarding graduate on time student
367 loans, in paragraph (1) and subparagraphs (4)(A) and (4)(B), by replacing "associate" with
368 "associate's".
369 (43) Code Section 20-3-405.1, relating to definitions regarding Education for Public Service
370 Student Loan, in subparagraphs (4)(A) and (4)(B), by replacing "associate degrees" with
371 "associate's degrees".
S. B. 153
- 15 -

25 LC 39 4444
372 (44) Code Section 20-3-405.2, relating to eligibility, repayment period, maximum amount,
373 application, and statement of requirements, in subsection (c), by replacing "associate degree,"
374 with "associate's degree,".
375 (45) Code Section 20-3-431, relating to "eligible student" defined, in the introductory
376 language, by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in".
377 (46) Code Section 20-3-441, relating to "eligible student" defined, in the introductory
378 language, by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in".
379 (47) Code Section 20-3-499, relating to selection of REACH scholars, in
380 division (a)(1)(B)(i), by replacing "SNAP (Food Stamp)" with "Supplemental Nutrition
381 Assistance Program (SNAP)" and in division (a)(1)(B)(ii), by replacing "TANF" with
382 "Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF)".
383 (48) Code Section 20-3-519, relating to definitions regarding HOPE scholarships and grants,
384 in the undesignated text at the end of subparagraph (6)(A), by replacing "however, that" with
385 "however, that," and in paragraph (25), by replacing "U.S.C.A." with "U.S.C.".
386 (49) Code Section 20-3-519.2, relating to eligibility requirements for a HOPE scholarship
387 and award amount, in the introductory language of subsection (a) and in the introductory
388 language of subsection (b), by replacing "associate" with "associate's" and in
389 paragraph (d)(3), by replacing "however, that" with "however, that," each time the phrase
390 appears.
391 (50) Code Section 20-3-519.5, relating to eligibility requirements for a HOPE grant and
392 award amount, in the introductory language of subsection (a.1) and the undesignated text at
393 the end of subsection (a.1), by replacing "associate degree" with "associate's degree".
394 (51) Code Section 20-3-564, relating to authorization to dispose of property, by replacing
395 "however, that" with "however, that,".
396 (52) Code Section 20-3-633, relating to creation, board of directors, and assignment to
397 Department of Administrative Services, in paragraph (a)(1), by replacing "Chancellor" with
398 "chancellor".
S. B. 153
- 16 -

25 LC 39 4444
399 (53) Code Section 20-3-642, relating to records not open to public inspection and duration,
400 in paragraph (a)(2), by replacing "clearing house" with "clearing-house".
401 (54) Article 13 of Chapter 3, relating to compensation of intercollegiate athletes, by
402 repealing said article.
403 (55) Code Section 20-4-1, relating to acceptance of federal act regarding vocational
404 education, by replacing "(20 U.S.C.A. Section 11, et seq.; c. 114, Section 1, 39 Stat. 929),"
405 with "(20 U.S.C. Section 11, et seq.; 39 Stat. 929),".
406 (56) Code Section 20-4-4, relating to employing teachers under federal act, by replacing "(20
407 U.S.C.A. Section 11, et seq.; c. 114, Section 1, 39 Stat. 929)," with "(20 U.S.C. Section 11,
408 et seq.; 39 Stat. 929),".
409 (57) Code Section 20-4-10, relating to the State Board of the Technical College System of
410 Georgia established, members, and officers, in subsection (a), by replacing "however, in"
411 with "provided, however, that, in".
412 (58) Code Section 20-4-11, relating to powers of the State Board of the Technical College
413 System of Georgia, at the end of division (3)(C)(ii), by replacing the period with a semicolon.
414 (59) Code Section 20-4-11.1, relating to public forums designated, "free speech zones"
415 prohibited, allowed restrictions, protected expressive activity, construction, required
416 materials, and annual reporting, in paragraph (a)(5), by replacing "This term" with "Such
417 term" and in subsection (h), by replacing "websites," with "public websites,".
418 (60) Code Section 20-4-15, relating to establishment of adult literacy programs, eligibility,
419 and office of adult literacy, in the introductory language of subsection (d), by replacing
420 "who:" with "who are:", in paragraph (d)(1), by replacing "Are high" with "High", and in
421 paragraph (d)(2), by replacing "Are at" with "At".
422 (61) Code Section 20-4-17, relating to agencies to receive federal funds and transfer of
423 personnel to Department of Technical and Adult Education, now known as Technical
424 College System of Georgia, in subsection (a), by replacing "further," with "further, that".
S. B. 153
- 17 -

25 LC 39 4444
425 (62) Code Section 20-4-41, relating to extent and nature of training to be offered, by
426 replacing "however, no" with "however, that no".
427 (63) Article 5 of Chapter 4, relating to the Georgia Joint Defense Commission, by replacing
428 "commissioner of the Department of Economic Development" with "commissioner of
429 economic development" each time the phrase appears in:
430 (A) Code Section 20-4-120, relating to the creation of commission and membership;
431 (B) Code Section 20-4-131, relating to administration of grant program and purpose;
432 (C) Code Section 20-4-132, relating to awarding of grants;
433 (D) Code Section 20-4-133, relating to grant application requirements; and
434 (E) Code Section 20-4-134, relating to rules and regulations.
435 (64) Code Section 20-4-141, relating to establishment of pilot program, awarding of high
436 school diploma to successful participants, skills and knowledge, eligibility for participation,
437 and regulation, in paragraph (a)(1) and subparagraph (f)(3)(A), by replacing "associate
438 degree" with "associate's degree" and in divisions (e)(4)(A)(iii) and (e)(4)(B)(ii), by replacing
439 "U.S.C.A." with "U.S.C." each time the term appears.
440 (65) Code Section 20-4-151, relating to purpose, employer partnerships, required
441 information, contracts, awards, and limitations, in paragraph (d)(1), by replacing
442 "$10,000.00" with "Ten thousand dollars", in paragraph (d)(2), by replacing "$5,000.00" with
443 "Five thousand dollars", and in paragraph (e)(2), by deleting "the" preceding "Fiscal Year
444 2025".
445 (66) Code Section 20-4-153, relating to annual reporting and cooperation from
446 apprenticeship sponsor, in the introductory language of subsection (a), by inserting "public"
447 preceding "website".
448 (67) Code Section 20-5-2, relating to powers and duties of the board of regents and director
449 of University of Georgia Libraries, abolition of State Library Commission and transfer of
450 functions, reports of state publications, and electronic submission, in subsection (e), by
451 replacing "For purposes of this article, 'public documents' shall mean" with "As used in this
S. B. 153
- 18 -

25 LC 39 4444
452 Code section, the term 'public documents' means" and in subsection (k), by replacing
453 "Division of Archives and History," with "Division of Archives and History of the University
454 System of Georgia,".
455 (68) Code Section 20-5-5, relating to internet safety policies in public libraries, in
456 paragraphs (a)(1) and (h)(1), by replacing "Internet" with "internet".
457 (69) Code Section 20-8-1, relating to definitions regarding campus policemen, in
458 paragraph (1), by replacing "The term 'campus'" with "Such term".
459 (70) Code Section 20-12-1, relating to definitions regarding marine resources extension
460 centers and institute for oceanographic studies, in paragraph (3), by deleting "as defined in
461 paragraph (2) of this Code section".
462 (71) Code Section 20-14-27, relating to required reports and publication format, in
463 subsection (b), by inserting "public" preceding "website".
464 (72) Code Section 20-14-33, relating to indicators of quality of learning in individual
465 schools and school systems, comparison to state standards, rating schools and school
466 systems, providing information, and uniform definition of "dropout" and "below grade level,"
467 in paragraph (c)(3), by inserting "public" preceding "website".
468 (73) Code Section 20-14-49.11, relating to financial information available on websites, in
469 the introductory language of subsections (a) and (b) and in paragraphs (c)(5), (d)(1), and
470 (d)(2), by inserting "public" preceding "website", in the introductory language of
471 subsection (c), by replacing "a website" with "a public website", by replacing "on its website"
472 with "on such website", and by inserting "public" preceding "website:", and in the
473 introductory language of subsection (d), by replacing "a website" with "a public website" and
474 by replacing "on its website" with "on such website".
475 (74) Code Section 20-14-49.12, relating to rules and regulations and deadline for publication
476 of information required by Code Section 20-14-49.11, in subsection (b), by inserting "public"
477 preceding "website".
S. B. 153
- 19 -

25 LC 39 4444
478 (75) Code Section 20-14-49.13, relating to reporting of percentage of students with each
479 state funded characteristic included in Code Section 20-2-161, online sortable database,
480 underlying fiscal data for financial efficiency ratings, and inter-agency cooperation, in
481 subsection (d), by inserting "public" preceding "website".
482 (76) Code Section 20-14-96, relating to accrediting agencies, standards, applicability, and
483 construction, in paragraph (e)(2), by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
484 (77) Code Section 20-17-2, relating to provisions of The Interstate Compact on Educational
485 Opportunity for Military Children, in Section A of Article II and in Section A(1) of Article
486 III, by replacing "10 U.S.C. Sections 1209 and 1211" with "10 U.S.C. Chapters 1209 and
487 1211".
488 SECTION 21.
489 Title 21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elections, is amended in:
490 (1) Code Section 21-2-217, relating to rules for determining residence, by revising
491 subparagraph (a)(2)(B) and subsection (b) as follows:
492 "(B) If a person returns to his or her original or new residence after voting or
493 registering to vote in a different or separate jurisdiction, such person shall update their
494 his or her voter registration with their his or her current residency jurisdiction in order
495 to be deemed a valid registered elector and resident of such jurisdiction for voting
496 purposes; and"
497 "(b) In determining a voter's qualification to register and vote, the registrars to whom such
498 application is made shall consider, in addition to the applicant's expressed intent, any
499 relevant circumstances determining the applicant's residence. The registrars taking such
500 registration may consider the applicant's financial independence,; business pursuits,;
501 employment,; income sources,; residence for income tax purposes,; age,; marital status,;
502 residence of parents, spouse, and children, if any,; leaseholds,; sites of personal and real
503 property owned by the applicant,; motor vehicle and other personal property registration,;
S. B. 153
- 20 -

25 LC 39 4444
504 National Change of Address program information sponsored by the United States Postal
505 Service,; and other such factors that the registrars may reasonably deem necessary to
506 determine the qualification of an applicant to vote in a primary or election. The decision
507 of the registrars to whom such application is made shall be presumptive evidence of a
508 person's residence for voting purposes."
509 SECTION 22.
510 Reserved.
511 SECTION 23.
512 Reserved.
513 SECTION 24.
514 Reserved.
515 SECTION 25.
516 Reserved.
517 SECTION 26.
518 Title 26 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to food, drugs, and cosmetics,
519 is amended in:
520 (1) Code Section 26-4-116.1, relating to licensed health practitioners authorized to prescribe
521 auto-injectable epinephrine for schools and pharmacists authorized to fill prescriptions, in
522 subsection (b), by replacing "Code Section 31-1-14" with "Code Section 31-1-15".
523 SECTION 27.
524 Reserved.
S. B. 153
- 21 -

25 LC 39 4444
525 SECTION 28.
526 Reserved.
527 SECTION 29.
528 Title 29 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to guardian and ward, is
529 amended in:
530 (1) Code Section 29-5-3, relating to order of preference in selecting conservator, nomination
531 of individual to serve as conservator, and requirements of nomination, in paragraph (b)(4),
532 by replacing "(c)" with "(d)".
533 SECTION 30.
534 Reserved.
535 SECTION 31.
536 Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to health, is amended in:
537 (1) Code Section 31-1-6, relating to reuse of heart pacemakers, in subsection (b), by deleting
538 ", as defined in subsection (a) of this Code section,".
539 (2) Code Section 31-1-8, relating to notice of proposed special facility, in the introductory
540 language of subsection (a), by replacing "For the purposes of" with "As used in", in
541 paragraph (a)(1), by replacing "drug users as defined in paragraph (11) of" with "drug
542 abusers as defined in", and in paragraph (a)(2), by replacing "provided such" with "provided
543 that such".
544 (3) Code Section 31-1-9, relating to breast-feeding of baby, by replacing "breast-feeding"
545 with "breastfeeding" and by replacing "breast-feed" with "breastfeed".
546 (4) Code Section 31-1-19, relating to prohibition on expenditure or use of state resources to
547 advocate for or intend to influence citizens in support of Medicaid expansion under the
548 federal Affordable Care Act, in subsection (a), by replacing "Public Law" with "P.L.".
S. B. 153
- 22 -

25 LC 39 4444
549 (5) Code Section 31-1-24, relating to organ transplant protections for individuals with
550 disabilities and civil relief for violations, in division (a)(2)(C)(ii), by inserting a comma
551 following "Section 1320d" and by replacing "such Act" with "such act".
552 (6) Code Section 31-2-4, relating to department's powers, duties, functions, and
553 responsibilities, divisions, directors, and contracts for health benefits, in
554 subparagraph (a)(1)(A), by replacing "State of Georgia, et al. v. Philip Morris, Inc., et al.,"
555 with "State of Georgia, et al. v. Philip Morris, Inc., et al.," and in the introductory language
556 of subparagraph (d)(10)(B) and in subparagraph (d)(11)(B), by replacing "For purposes of"
557 with "As used in".
558 (7) Code Section 31-2-8, relating to actions against certain applicants or licensees, in
559 subsection (a), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in", by replacing "shall be used
560 to refer to" with "means", and by replacing "provisions of the law" with "provisions of law"
561 and in subparagraph (c)(6)(B), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in".
562 (8) Code Section 31-2-17, which is repealed, by designating said Code section as reserved.
563 (9) Code Section 31-2-18, relating to website reporting on state health plans, in
564 paragraph (a)(1), by replacing "Medical" with "The medical", in paragraph (a)(2), by
565 replacing "PeachCare" with "The PeachCare", in the introductory language of subsection (b),
566 by replacing "department website" with "department's public website", and in
567 paragraph (b)(3), by replacing "non-emergent" with "nonemergent".
568 (10) Code Section 31-2A-12, relating to the Georgia Commission on Maternal and Infant
569 Health and composition, membership, duties, and responsibilities, in subsection (c), by
570 replacing "council" with "commission", in paragraph (e)(5), by inserting a comma following
571 "chapter", and in subsection (h), by inserting "and reserved" following "repealed".
572 (11) Code Section 31-2A-16, relating to Maternal Mortality Review Committee established,
573 in paragraph (d)(1), by replacing "Chapter 7 of Title 31," with "Chapter 7 of this title,".
574 (12) Code Section 31-5-3, relating to appeals, in paragraph (a)(2), by replacing "however,"
575 with "however, that,".
S. B. 153
- 23 -

25 LC 39 4444
576 (13) Code Section 31-6-21.1, relating to procedures for rule making by Department of
577 Community Health, in subsection (h), by replacing "For purposes of this Code section, 'rules'
578 shall mean" with "As used in this Code section, the term 'rules' means".
579 (14) Code Section 31-6-40, relating to certificate of need required for new institutional
580 health services and exemption, in subsection (d), by replacing "however, all" with "however,
581 that all".
582 (15) Code Section 31-6-42, relating to qualifications for issuance of certificate, in the
583 undesignated text at the end of subsection (c), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used
584 in".
585 (16) Code Section 31-6-43, relating to acceptance or rejection of application for certificate,
586 in subsection (k), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in".
587 (17) Code Section 31-6-44.1, relating to judicial review, in subsection (c), by replacing
588 "however," with "however, that".
589 (18) Code Section 31-6-45.2, relating to participation as Medicaid provider requirement,
590 termination by health care facility of participation as provider of medical assistance, and
591 monetary penalty, in the introductory language of paragraph (b)(3), by replacing "For
592 purposes of this Code section, 'good cause' shall mean:" with "As used in this Code section,
593 the term 'good cause' means:".
594 (19) Code Section 31-6-70, relating to reports to the department by certain health care
595 facilities and all ambulatory surgical centers and imaging centers and public availability, in
596 the introductory language of paragraph (b)(8), by replacing "person" with "persons", in
597 subsection (g), by replacing "department website" with "department's public website", and
598 in subsection (h), by deleting "publicly" and by inserting "public" preceding "websites".
599 (20) Code Section 31-7-1, relating to definitions regarding regulation and construction of
600 hospitals other health care facilities, in the undesignated text at the end of paragraph (4), by
601 replacing "The term 'institution'" with "Such term" and in subparagraph (8)(B), by inserting
602 "that" following "provided".
S. B. 153
- 24 -

25 LC 39 4444
603 (21) Code Section 31-7-2.2, relating to determination that patients or residents in an
604 institution, community living arrangement, or treatment program are in danger, relocation
605 of patients or residents, and suspension of admissions, in the introductory language of
606 paragraph (c)(1), by replacing "or program" with "or a program".
607 (22) Code Section 31-7-7, relating to refusal or revocation by public hospital of staff
608 privileges, in subsection (a), by replacing "however," with "however, that,".
609 (23) Code Section 31-7-12, relating to personal care homes, licensure and registration,
610 inspection by local boards, fees, investigations, waiver, variance, or exemption, staffing,
611 training, and financial stability requirements, and certified medication aides, in
612 paragraph (a)(2), by replacing "This term" with "Such term" and by deleting "of
613 subsection (b)".
614 (24) Code Section 31-7-12.2, relating to regulation and licensing of assisted living
615 communities, legislative intent, definitions, procedures, and requirements for medication
616 aides, in subsection (e), by replacing "Office" with "office".
617 (25) Code Section 31-7-12.8, relating to certification as nurse aide, employer sponsored
618 training and competency examination programs, and provisional practice by military medical
619 personnel, in subsection (d), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in".
620 (26) Code Section 31-7-55, relating to administration of state funds, by inserting "federal"
621 preceding "Public Health Service Act".
622 (27) Code Section 31-7-56, relating to adherence to federal law and regulations, by inserting
623 "federal" preceding "Public Health Service Act".
624 (28) Code Section 31-7-92, relating to filing of audits, by deleting the comma following
625 "municipality".
626 (29) Code Section 31-7-133, relating to confidentiality of review organization's records, in
627 subsection (a) and paragraph (b)(2), by replacing "however, such" with "however, that such".
628 (30) Code Section 31-7-407.1, relating to report of findings, by replacing "the time for
629 issuing said" with "that the time for issuing such".
S. B. 153
- 25 -

25 LC 39 4444
630 (31) Code Section 31-8-3, relating to disbursement of state funds to counties, by replacing
631 "however, the" with "however, that the".
632 (32) Code Section 31-8-9.1, relating to eligibility to receive tax credits, obligations of rural
633 hospitals after receipt of funds, and posting information on website, in
634 subparagraph (a)(3)(H), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in" and in the
635 introductory language of subsection (d) and in paragraph (d)(5), by inserting "public"
636 preceding "website".
637 (33) Code Section 31-8-82, relating to persons required to report abuse or exploitation, time
638 for making report, contents of report, records, and privileged communications, in
639 paragraph (a)(9), by replacing "Title 31" with "this title".
640 (34) Code Section 31-8-171, relating to definitions regarding quality assessment fees on care
641 management organizations, in paragraph (1), by deleting "of the Official Code of Georgia
642 Annotated" and by replacing "Sec." with "Section".
643 (35) Code Section 31-8-307, relating to referrals to the drug repository program, in the
644 introductory language of subsection (a), by inserting a comma following "Corrections" and
645 in paragraph (a)(3), by inserting a comma following "limited to".
646 (36) Code Section 31-9-2, relating to persons authorized to consent to surgical or medical
647 treatment, in paragraph (a)(7), by replacing "For purposes of this paragraph," with "As used
648 in this paragraph, the term" and in subsection (c), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As
649 used in".
650 (37) Code Section 31-9-6.1, relating to disclosure of certain information to persons
651 undergoing certain surgical or diagnostic procedures, failure to comply, exceptions, and
652 regulations establishing standards for implementation, in paragraph (e)(4), by inserting a
653 comma following "however, that".
654 (38) Code Section 31-9A-2, relating to definitions regarding woman's right to know, in
655 paragraph (1), by replacing "The term 'abortion'" with "Such term" each time the phrase
S. B. 153
- 26 -

25 LC 39 4444
656 appears, in paragraph (6), by replacing "Internet" with "internet", and in paragraph (7), by
657 replacing "homo sapiens" with "Homo sapiens".
658 (39) Code Section 31-9A-3, relating to voluntary and informed consent to abortion and
659 availability of ultrasound, in subparagraph (2)(D), by replacing "they shall" with "such
660 materials shall".
661 (40) Code Section 31-9B-2, relating to requirement to determine presence of detectable
662 human heartbeat of unborn child, in subsection (b), by inserting a comma following "Code
663 Section 43-34-8".
664 (41) Code Section 31-10-14, relating to issuance of new certificate of birth following
665 adoption and legitimation or paternity determination, in subsection (b), by replacing
666 "step-parent" with "stepparent".
667 (42) Code Section 31-11-52, relating to certification and recertification of, and training for,
668 paramedics and cardiac technicians, qualifications by felons, and provisional practice by
669 military medical personnel, in subsection (e), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used
670 in".
671 (43) Code Section 31-11-53, relating to services which may be rendered by certified
672 emergency medical technicians and trainees and provisional practice by military medical
673 personnel, in subsection (d), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in".
674 (44) Code Section 31-11-82, relating to evaluation of person with emergency condition,
675 initiation of intervention without prospective authorization, and insurer may not deny
676 payment after prospective authorization given, in subsection (a), by replacing "For purposes
677 of" with "As used in".
678 (45) Code Section 31-12-2, relating to reporting certain diseases and neonatal abstinence
679 syndrome, confidentiality, reporting required of pharmacists, immunity from liability as to
680 information supplied, and notification of potential bioterrorism, in subsection (a), by
681 replacing "however," with "however, that" and in paragraph (a.1)(2), by replacing
682 "diagnosis" with "diagnoses".
S. B. 153
- 27 -

25 LC 39 4444
683 (46) Code Section 31-12-3.1, relating to vaccination registry and reporting requirements,
684 maintenance, and use of information, in the undesignated text at the end of subsection (b),
685 by replacing "United States" with "federal".
686 (47) Code Section 31-12-4.1, relating to smallpox vaccination and treatment program, in
687 paragraph (b)(2), by replacing "workers," with "worker," and by replacing "said hospital"
688 with "such hospital," and in the undesignated text at the end of subsection (b), by replacing
689 "said" with "such".
690 (48) Code Section 31-12-13, relating to definitions concerning bloodborne pathogens,
691 standards, and funds for research and development, in the introductory language of
692 subsection (a), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in".
693 (49) Code Section 31-13-6, relating to bonding licensees, in subsection (a), by replacing
694 "bond not less" with "bond of not less".
695 (50) Code Section 31-14-14, relating to immunity from liability, by replacing "Title 31,"
696 with "this title,".
697 (51) Code Section 31-17-4.2, relating to HIV and syphilis pregnancy screening, in
698 paragraph (b)(2), by replacing "28–32" with "28 to 32".
699 (52) Code Section 31-20-2, relating to performance of sterilization procedure upon request,
700 by replacing "that prior to or at the time of such request" with "that, prior to or at the time of
701 such request,".
702 (53) Code Section 31-21-3, relating to death of person with infectious or communicable
703 disease, required reporting procedures, confidentiality, disclosure, and penalties, in the
704 introductory language of subsection (a), by replacing "For the purposes of" with "As used
705 in" and in paragraph (a)(3), by replacing "or" with "and".
706 (54) Code Section 31-21-6, relating to notification of law enforcement agency upon
707 disturbance, destruction, or debasement of human remains, in the introductory language of
708 subsection (b), by replacing "ancestors of or" with "ancestors of".
S. B. 153
- 28 -

25 LC 39 4444
709 (55) Code Section 31-21-7, relating to preneed contracts and revisions, affidavit on
710 disposition of remains, role of probate court, warrant as to truthfulness, and liability of
711 funeral home, in paragraph (c)(4), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in".
712 (56) Code Section 31-21-20, relating to Board for the Distribution of Cadavers, by replacing
713 "For the purposes of" with "As used in".
714 (57) Code Section 31-21-21, relating to delivery to board of certain unclaimed bodies, in
715 subsection (a), by deleting "for distribution".
716 (58) Code Section 31-21-23, relating to distribution of bodies by board, by deleting "for
717 distribution" and by deleting "above-specified".
718 (59) Code Section 31-21-24, relating to transportation of bodies, by deleting "for
719 distribution" and by deleting "above".
720 (60) Code Section 31-21-26, relating to payment of expenses, by deleting "for distribution".
721 (61) Code Section 31-33-2, relating to furnishing copy of records to patient, provider, or
722 other authorized person, in paragraph (b)(1), by replacing "42 U.S.C. Section 1320d-2, et
723 seq.," with "P.L. 104-191,".
724 (62) Code Section 31-33-7, relating to furnishing copies of psychological or psychiatric
725 evaluation to law enforcement officer upon request, in subsection (c), by inserting a comma
726 following "information".
727 (63) Code Section 31-33-8, relating to electronic records and application to psychiatric,
728 psychological, or other mental health records, in subsection (g), by inserting a comma
729 following "(d)".
730 (64) Code Section 31-34-4, relating to loan applicant qualifications and rules and
731 regulations, in paragraph (a)(1), by replacing "Education or the American Osteopathic
732 Association" with "Education, the American Osteopathic Association,", in paragraph (c)(1),
733 by replacing "consider among other criteria for granting loans under the provisions of this
734 article" with "consider, among other criteria for granting loans under the provisions of this
735 article,", and in paragraph (c)(2), by replacing "consider among other criteria for granting
S. B. 153
- 29 -

25 LC 39 4444
736 loans under the provisions of this article" with "consider, among other criteria for granting
737 loans under the provisions of this article," and by replacing "future census state" with "future
738 such census".
739 (65) Code Section 31-34-5, relating to service cancelable loan, amount, repayment, and
740 determination of underserved rural areas, in paragraph (a)(1), by replacing "that for
741 applicants that" with "that, for applicants who".
742 (66) Code Section 31-34-6, relating to contract between applicant and state agreeing to terms
743 and conditions of loan, breach of contract, and service cancelable contracts, in
744 paragraph (b)(2), by replacing "article who breaches" with "article that breaches".
745 (67) Code Section 31-35-1, relating to legislative findings, by replacing "the United States
746 Centers" with "the federal Centers".
747 (68) Code Section 31-36B-5, relating to healthcare decision making by lay caregiver, no
748 delay in care, and responsibilities, in subsection (e), by replacing "Center for Medicare" with
749 "federal Centers for Medicare".
750 (69) Code Section 31-41-12, relating to definitions regarding childhood lead exposure
751 control, in paragraph (2), by replacing "age including" with "age, including" and in
752 paragraph (7), by replacing "14 U.S.C. Code Section 185(b)(15)" with "P.L. 102-550,".
753 (70) Code Section 31-45A-3, relating to development of model aquatic safety plan, in
754 subsection (a), by inserting "public" preceding "website" and in subsection (d), by inserting
755 "federal" preceding "Centers".
756 (71) Code Section 31-49-3, relating to duties and responsibilities of the Georgia Council on
757 Lupus Education and Awareness, in paragraph (a)(2), by inserting "federal" preceding
758 "Centers" and in subsection (b), by inserting "public" preceding "website".
759 (72) Code Section 31-52-3, relating to definitions regarding the "Georgia Right to Try Act,"
760 in subparagraph (5)(A), by replacing "Title 31" with "this title".
761 (73) Code Section 31-53-3, relating to establishment of Office of Health Strategy and
762 Coordination and powers and duties, in paragraph (b)(16), by inserting "and" preceding
S. B. 153
- 30 -

25 LC 39 4444
763 "practice" and by replacing "outcome" with "outcomes" and in paragraph (b)(23), by
764 replacing "Centralizing" with "Centralize".
765 (74) Code Section 31-53-47, relating to submission of claims and personal identification
766 data not public record, in subsection (b), by deleting the comma following "paid" and by
767 replacing "Data Submission Guide" with "data submission guide" and in subsection (d), by
768 replacing "claim" with "claims".
769 (75) Code Section 31-53-50, relating to penalties for noncompliance, in subsection (b), by
770 deleting the comma following "31-53-51".
771 (76) Code Section 31-54-2, relating to law enforcement powers, required training, and
772 carrying of weapon, in subsection (a), by inserting a comma following "however, that" and
773 "further, that" and in subsection (b), by replacing "must" with "shall".
774 (77) The following Code sections, by inserting "public" preceding "website" and "websites"
775 each time the term appears:
776 (A) Code Section 31-1-18, relating to individuals with high risk for breast cancer and
777 consumer information;
778 (B) Code Section 31-2-10, relating to information and comparisons regarding state-wide
779 cost and quality of health care;
780 (C) Code Section 31-2-14, relating to nurse aide registry, complaint filing, and public
781 access;
782 (D) Code Section 31-2-15, relating to streamlining and expediting credentialing and billing
783 processes;
784 (E) Code Section 31-2A-36, relating to criteria for grant consideration;
785 (F) Code Section 31-2A-54, relating to listing of designated facilities and self-assessment
786 tool;
787 (G) Code Section 31-7-22, relating to required publication by hospital of certain
788 documentation on website, updating, penalty for noncompliance, enforcement, and
789 individual criminal penalty;
S. B. 153
- 31 -

25 LC 39 4444
790 (H) Code Section 31-7-193, relating to Palliative Care Consumer and Professional
791 Information and Education Program;
792 (I) Code Section 31-7-434, relating to informational materials and public accessibility;
793 (J) Code Section 31-8-305, relating to substitutions of drugs or biological products,
794 limitations, and recording;
795 (K) Code Section 31-11-115, relating to distribution of list of state identified stroke centers
796 to emergency medical services providers, development of a model stroke triage assessment
797 tool, and assessment, treatment, and transport of stroke patients;
798 (L) Code Section 31-11-116, relating to annual reports;
799 (M) Code Section 31-11-134, relating to data reporting system;
800 (N) Code Section 31-11-136, relating to listing of emergency cardiac care centers,
801 emergency cardiac care triage assessment tool, and protocols;
802 (O) Code Section 31-45A-4, relating to publication of model aquatic safety plan on
803 website and additional instructional materials;
804 (P) Code Section 31-49-4, relating to distribution of information;
805 (Q) Code Section 31-50-3, relating to purpose, required activities, and funding; and
806 (R) Code Section 31-53-6, relating to compiling of reports and public dissemination of
807 data.
808 (78) The following Code sections, by inserting "federal" preceding "Centers for Disease
809 Control and Prevention" each time the term appears:
810 (A) Code Section 31-7-18, relating to vaccinations for influenza and pneumococcal disease
811 for certain discharged patients, vaccinations or other measures for health care workers and
812 other employees in hospitals, immunity from liability, and standing orders;
813 (B) Code Section 31-7-19, relating to nursing homes to annually offer influenza
814 vaccinations to health care workers and other employees and immunity from liability;
815 (C) Code Section 31-7-21, relating to provision of influenza education information to
816 assisted living community residents;
S. B. 153
- 32 -

25 LC 39 4444
817 (D) Code Section 31-12-3.2, relating to meningococcal disease, vaccinations, and
818 disclosures; and
819 (E) Code Section 31-22-9.2, relating to HIV tests and report of positive results,
820 notification, counseling, violations, exception for insurance coverage, and exposure of
821 health care provider.
822 SECTION 32.
823 Reserved.
824 SECTION 33.
825 Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to insurance, is amended in:
826 (1) Code Section 33-64-7, relating to the Commissioner of Insurance's authority over rules
827 and regulations, in subsection (c), by replacing "deidentified" with "de-identified".
828 (2) Code Section 33-66-6, relating to data analysis and initial report, in subsection (b), by
829 replacing "this Code Section" with "this Code section" and in subsection (c), by replacing
830 "Governor's Office," with "Governor's office,".
831 SECTION 34.
832 Title 34 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to labor and industrial relations,
833 is amended in:
834 (1) Code Section 34-8-167, relating to collection of delinquent contribution payments
835 generally, in subsection (b), by replacing "Code Sections 48-2-55 and 48-3-1" with "Code
836 Section 48-2-55".
837 SECTION 35.
838 Title 35 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to law enforcement officers and
839 agencies, is amended in:
S. B. 153
- 33 -

25 LC 39 4444
840 (1) Code Section 35-1-2, relating to examination of sexual assault victims and reports, in
841 subsection (g), by inserting "public" preceding "website".
842 (2) Code Section 35-1-8, relating to acquisition, collection, classification, and preservation
843 of information assisting in identifying deceased persons and locating missing persons, in
844 paragraph (b)(1), by replacing "For purposes of this subsection," with "As used in this
845 subsection, the term".
846 (3) Code Section 35-1-19, relating to disclosure of arrest booking photographs prohibited,
847 in subsection (b), by replacing "State Sexual Offender Registry," with "state sexual offender
848 registry," and by inserting "public" preceding "website." and in paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(2),
849 by inserting "public" preceding "website" each time the term appears.
850 (4) Code Section 35-2-15, relating to off-duty use of motor vehicles and other equipment by
851 certain law enforcement officers, conditions for use, and rules and regulations, in
852 paragraph (a)(3), by replacing "Board of Public Safety." with "board.".
853 (5) Code Section 35-2-49, relating to provision of uniforms and equipment to sworn
854 members of the Department of Public Safety and radio operators and retention of weapons
855 and badges upon retirement, by replacing "Department of Public Safety" with "department"
856 each time the term appears and by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
857 (6) Code Section 35-2-51, relating to storeroom for excess clothing, equipment, and other
858 articles and disposition of old and worn equipment, in subsection (b), by replacing "must"
859 with "shall" and by replacing "Department of Public Safety" with "department".
860 (7) Code Section 35-2-52, relating to clothing allowance for members of Uniform Division
861 assigned permanently to personal security or special duty assignments, by replacing "Board
862 of Public Safety," with "board,".
863 (8) Code Section 35-2-57, relating to use of retired unmarked pursuit cars for training, by
864 replacing "Georgia State Patrol" with "Uniform Division" and by deleting "of public safety"
865 following "commissioner".
S. B. 153
- 34 -

25 LC 39 4444
866 (9) Code Section 35-2-81, relating to definitions regarding Department of Public Safety
867 nomenclature, in paragraph (1), by replacing "Department of Public Safety," with
868 "department,", and by deleting paragraphs (2) and (3) and by redesignating paragraphs (4)
869 through (6) as paragraphs (2) through (4), respectively.
870 (10) Code Section 35-2-84, relating to procedure for seeking permission to use department
871 nomenclature or symbols, by replacing "Board of Public Safety." with "board.".
872 (11) Code Section 35-2-120, relating to definitions regarding the Capitol Police Division,
873 by deleting paragraphs (2) and (3) and by redesignating paragraph (4) as paragraph (2).
874 (12) Code Section 35-3-5, relating to director and creation, appointment and removal, and
875 powers and duties, in subsection (b), by replacing "Board of Public Safety" with "board".
876 (13) Code Section 35-3-7, relating to agreements by director and commissioner for provision
877 of services and material, by deleting "of public safety" following "commissioner" and by
878 replacing "Board of Public Safety," with "board,".
879 (14) Code Section 35-3-31, relating to establishment of center, staff and equipment
880 generally, and State Personnel Board status of personnel, in subsection (a), by replacing
881 "Georgia Bureau of Investigation," with "bureau," and in subsection (c), by replacing
882 "Department of Public Safety," with "department,".
883 (15) Code Section 35-3-63, relating to creation of task force and purposes, by replacing
884 "Georgia Bureau of Investigation" with "bureau" each time the term appears and by replacing
885 "This Antiterrorism Task Force" with "The task force".
886 (16) Code Section 35-3-104, relating to procedures for seeking permission to use bureau
887 nomenclature or symbols, by replacing "Board of Public Safety." with "board.".
888 (17) Code Section 35-3-150, relating to definitions regarding the Division of Forensic
889 Sciences, by revising said Code section as follows:
890 "35-3-150.
891 As used in this article, the term:
892 (1) 'Board' means the Board of Public Safety.
S. B. 153
- 35 -

25 LC 39 4444
893 (2)(1) 'Crime lab' or 'state crime lab' means the Division of Forensic Sciences of the
894 Georgia Bureau of Investigation bureau.
895 (3) 'Director' means the director of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation.
896 (4)(2) 'Division' means the Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of
897 Investigation bureau.
898 (5)(3) 'Division director' means the director of the Division of Forensic Sciences of the
899 Georgia Bureau of Investigation bureau.
900 (6)(4) 'Independent test' means a forensic analysis of evidence in the custody and
901 possession of the state or any political subdivision or authority thereof conducted at the
902 request of or on behalf of any person other than a prosecuting attorney, law enforcement
903 officer, or other authorized agent of the state or which are ordered conducted by a court
904 at the request of an accused.
905 (7)(5) 'Regional medical examiner' shall have the same meaning as defined in
906 paragraph (13) of set forth in Code Section 45-16-21.
907 (8)(6) 'Rule' or 'rules' means a rule or regulation adopted pursuant to Chapter 13 of
908 Title 50, the 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.'"
909 (18) Code Section 35-3-204, relating to membership in Georgia Information Sharing and
910 Analysis Center and availability of analysts, in subsection (a), by deleting "of public safety"
911 following "commissioner".
912 (19) Code Section 35-5-2, relating to board authorized to establish, operate, and maintain
913 center and powers of board as to selection and compensation of administrator, in the
914 introductory language of subsection (a), by replacing "Board of Public Safety" with "board"
915 and in subsections (b) and (c), by replacing "center" with "Georgia Public Safety Training
916 Center".
917 (20) Code Section 35-5-3, relating to assignment to Department of Public Safety for
918 administrative purposes and authorization to solicit and accept gifts, grants, donations,
S. B. 153
- 36 -

25 LC 39 4444
919 property, and services, in subsection (a), by replacing "center" with "Georgia Public Safety
920 Training Center" and by replacing "Department of Public Safety" with "department".
921 (21) Code Section 35-5-4, relating to powers and duties of administrator of Georgia Public
922 Safety Training Center, by replacing "center" with "Georgia Public Safety Training Center"
923 each time the term appears.
924 (22) Code Section 35-5-5, relating to center available for use by certain personnel, fees,
925 enrollment, authorization for expenditure of funds, and powers and duties, in subsections (a),
926 (b), and (c), by replacing "center" with "Georgia Public Safety Training Center" each time
927 the term appears.
928 (23) Code Section 35-5-7, relating to law enforcement unit, in subsection (a), by replacing
929 "center," with "Georgia Public Safety Training Center,".
930 (24) Code Section 35-6A-3, relating to membership, vacancies, and membership not bar to
931 holding public office, in paragraph (a)(1), by replacing "Board of Public Safety," with
932 "board," and by replacing "the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental
933 Disabilities," with "behavioral health and developmental disabilities,".
934 (25) Code Section 35-6A-4, relating to election of chairperson and vice chairperson,
935 meetings, minutes and records, and rules, in paragraph (2), by replacing "chairman" with
936 "chairperson" and in paragraph (3), by inserting "and" at the end.
937 (26) Code Section 35-6A-10, relating to incentives for using federal Department of
938 Homeland Security's Secure Communities initiative and obligations of council, in
939 paragraphs (b)(3) and (b)(4), by replacing "Internet website;" with "public website;".
940 (27) Code Section 35-6A-11, relating to juvenile justice advisory board and membership,
941 in paragraph (a)(8), by deleting "and" at the end and in subsection (d), by replacing "must"
942 with "shall".
943 (28) Code Section 35-6A-13, which is repealed, by designating said Code section as
944 reserved.
S. B. 153
- 37 -

25 LC 39 4444
945 (29) Code Section 35-6A-14, which is repealed, by designating said Code section as
946 reserved.
947 (30) Code Section 35-6A-15, relating to grant program for transportation costs to emergency
948 treatment facilities, by replacing "the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council" with "the
949 council".
950 (31) Code Section 35-6A-17, relating to the Georgia Motor Vehicle Crime Prevention
951 Advisory Board, membership, and termination, in paragraph (a)(4), by replacing "Office of
952 the Attorney General;" with "office of the Attorney General;".
953 (32) Code Section 35-8-3, relating to the establishment of Georgia Peace Officer Standards
954 and Training Council, membership, organization, and administrative assignment to
955 Department of Public Safety, in paragraph (b)(1), by deleting "of public safety" following
956 "commissioner" and in subsection (e), by replacing "the Department of Public Safety" with
957 "the department".
958 (33) Code Section 35-8-7.4, relating to bias motivated intimidation of first responders and
959 prosecution and penalty, in subsection (a), by replacing the comma with a semicolon
960 following "fire department" and by replacing the comma with a semicolon following "Code
961 Section 35-8-2".
962 (34) Code Section 35-8-8, relating to requirements for appointment or certification of
963 persons as peace officers and preemployment attendance at basic training course and
964 "employment related information" defined, in paragraph (c)(1), by replacing "For purposes
965 of this subsection," with "As used in this subsection,".
966 (35) Code Section 35-8-10, relating to applicability and effect of certification requirements
967 generally and requirements as to exempt persons, in subsection (b), by replacing "Department
968 of Public Safety," with "department," and by replacing "must" with "shall".
969 (36) Code Section 35-8-13.1, relating to training and certification of municipal probation
970 officers, in subsection (e), by replacing "The term 'municipal probation officer' as used in this
971 Code section means" with "As used in this Code section, the term 'municipal probation
S. B. 153
- 38 -

25 LC 39 4444
972 officer' means", by replacing "the term 'municipal probation officer'" with "such term", and
973 by replacing "the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council" with "the council"
974 and in subsection (f), by replacing "the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training
975 Council" with "the council".
976 (37) Code Section 35-8-20, relating to training requirements for police chiefs, department
977 heads, and wardens, effect of failure to fulfill training requirement, and waiver of
978 requirements, in subsections (b) and (e), by replacing "the Georgia Peace Officer Standards
979 and Training Council" with "the council".
980 (38) Code Section 35-8-20.1, relating to training for police chiefs and department heads
981 appointed after June 30, 1999, and waivers, in subsections (b) and (h), by replacing "the
982 Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council" with "the council".
983 (39) Code Section 35-8-21, relating to training requirements for peace officers, waiver,
984 exemption for retired peace officers, and confirmation of training, in subsection (a), by
985 replacing "the Department of Public Safety" with "the department" and by deleting "of public
986 safety" following "commissioner" and in subsections (b) and (e), by replacing "the Georgia
987 Peace Officer Standards and Training Council" with "the council".
988 (40) Code Section 35-8-23, relating to basic training course for communications officers,
989 certification requirements, duties of council, and rules and regulations, in subsection (d), by
990 replacing "(TDD's)" with "(TDDs)".
991 (41) Code Section 35-8-24, relating to training requirements for jail officers and juvenile
992 correctional officers, in paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2) and subsection (c), by replacing "the
993 Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council" with "the council".
994 (42) Code Section 35-8-26, relating to TASER and electronic control weapons, requirements
995 for use, establishment of policies, and training, in subsection (c), by replacing "the Georgia
996 Peace Officer Standards and Training Council" with "the council".
997 (43) The following Code sections, by replacing "Department of Public Safety" with
998 "department" each time the term appears:
S. B. 153
- 39 -

25 LC 39 4444
999 (A) Code Section 35-1-22, relating to prohibition on law enforcement retaining license
1000 plate data obtained from automated license plate recognition systems, limited use of data,
1001 and public disclosure prohibited;
1002 (B) Code Section 35-2-1, relating to creation of Board of Public Safety, composition, and
1003 appointment and terms of office of members;
1004 (C) Code Section 35-2-31, relating to composition;
1005 (D) Code Section 35-2-36.1, relating to Auxiliary Service of the Uniform Division,
1006 appointment of members, salary, authority and powers, equipment, and eligibility;
1007 (E) Code Section 35-2-41.1, relating to donation or conveyance of property, equipment,
1008 or services to the department and procedure;
1009 (F) Code Section 35-2-44, relating to enlistment, examination, preliminary training,
1010 subsequent instruction, and rules and regulations for discipline and conduct of recruits and
1011 troopers of Uniform Division;
1012 (G) Code Section 35-2-45, relating to promotions of personnel in Uniform Division;
1013 (H) Code Section 35-2-49.1, relating to retention of badge and weapon by disabled law
1014 enforcement officer;
1015 (I) Code Section 35-2-50, relating to purchasing of uniforms, supplies, and equipment;
1016 (J) Code Section 35-2-53, relating to members of Uniform Division to receive no costs or
1017 emoluments, exception for rewards, and payment and distribution of fines and costs;
1018 (K) Code Section 35-2-74, relating to Governor to prescribe coverage by State Personnel
1019 Board;
1020 (L) Code Section 35-2-102, relating to weight inspector positions, training, powers and
1021 responsibilities, and presence of certified peace officer;
1022 (M) Code Section 35-2-140, relating to transfer of certain personnel, aircraft, and other
1023 assets from the Georgia Aviation Authority to the department;
1024 (N) Code Section 35-2-160, relating to definitions regarding Office of Public Safety
1025 Support;
S. B. 153
- 40 -

25 LC 39 4444
1026 (O) Code Section 35-2-161, relating to Office of Public Safety Support established;
1027 (P) Code Section 35-2-163, relating to peer counseling and critical incident support
1028 services, certification, and employment of necessary staff;
1029 (Q) Code Section 35-3-4, relating to powers and duties of bureau generally;
1030 (R) Code Section 35-4-3, relating to academy assigned to department for administrative
1031 purposes; and
1032 (S) Code Section 35-8-2, relating to definitions regarding employment and training of
1033 peace officers.
1034 (44) The following Code sections, by replacing "Georgia Bureau of Investigation" with
1035 "bureau" each time the term appears:
1036 (A) Code Section 35-3-3, relating to divisions of bureau;
1037 (B) Code Section 35-3-33, relating to powers and duties of the Georgia Crime Information
1038 Center generally;
1039 (C) Code Section 35-3-34, relating to disclosure and dissemination of criminal records to
1040 private persons and businesses, resulting responsibility and liability of issuing center, and
1041 provision of certain information to the FBI in conjunction with the National Instant
1042 Criminal Background Check System;
1043 (D) Code Section 35-3-80, relating to definitions regarding the Missing Children
1044 Information Center;
1045 (E) Code Section 35-3-81, relating to establishment, development, maintenance, and
1046 operation of center and staff;
1047 (F) Code Section 35-3-84, relating to sending information to center;
1048 (G) Code Section 35-3-151, relating to responsibilities of the Division of Forensic
1049 Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation;
1050 (H) Code Section 35-3-152, relating to appointment, powers, and responsibilities of
1051 division director;
S. B. 153
- 41 -

25 LC 39 4444
1052 (I) Code Section 35-3-160, relating to DNA analysis in felony convictions and certain
1053 felony charges and performance of tests; and
1054 (J) Code Section 35-3-201, relating to the Georgia Information Sharing and Analysis
1055 Center established and purpose.
1056 SECTION 36.
1057 Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to local government, is amended
1058 in:
1059 (1) Code Section 36-1-20, relating to ordinances for governing and policing of
1060 unincorporated areas of county, in subsection (b), by inserting a comma following "however,
1061 that" and by inserting a comma following "Clean Water Act".
1062 (2) Code Section 36-5-28, relating to members of county governing authority to receive
1063 compensation increase when classified service employees receive increase, calculation, and
1064 effective date, by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1065 (3) Code Section 36-8-8, relating to limitation on decreasing funding for county police force
1066 and exceptions, in paragraph (c)(3), by inserting "public" preceding "website".
1067 (4) Code Section 36-9-3, relating to sale or disposition of county real property generally,
1068 right of certain counties to make private sale, and right of county to negotiate and
1069 consummate private sales of recreational set-asides, in division (a)(2)(B)(iv), by replacing
1070 "Create a website which posts:" with "Create a public website which posts", in
1071 subparagraph (a)(3)(D), by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,", and in
1072 subparagraph (g)(3)(B), by replacing "however," with "however, that".
1073 (5) Code Section 36-17-21, relating to allocation of funds, grant of tax credit to homesteads
1074 as prerequisite to receipt of funds, and use of surplus funds, in subsection (a), by replacing
1075 "For purposes of" with "As used in".
1076 (6) Code Section 36-32-2, relating to appointment of judges, in paragraph (a)(2), by
1077 replacing "provided such" with "provided that such".
S. B. 153
- 42 -

25 LC 39 4444
1078 (7) Code Section 36-32-2.1, relating to removal of judges, in the introductory language of
1079 paragraph (b)(3), by replacing "alleged" with "alleges" and in subparagraph (b)(3)(D), by
1080 deleting "of subsection (c)".
1081 (8) Code Section 36-32-13, relating to municipal court clerks and role of Municipal Courts
1082 Training Council, in the introductory language of subsection (a), by replacing "For purposes
1083 of" with "As used in".
1084 (9) Code Section 36-34-5, relating to acquisition and construction of water and sewage
1085 systems, in subsection (b), by replacing "subsection (c)" with "subsection (d)".
1086 (10) Code Section 36-36-4, relating to creation of unincorporated islands prohibited and
1087 authorization to provide services or functions, in subsection (b), by replacing "For purposes
1088 of this subsection, 'unincorporated island' shall have the same meaning as contained in
1089 paragraph (3) of Code Section 36-36-90." with "As used in this subsection, the term
1090 'unincorporated island' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 36-36-90.".
1091 (11) Code Section 36-36-11, relating to effect of objection to land use following rezoning
1092 and minimum procedures for addressing issues, in subsection (a), by replacing "however,
1093 that" with "however, that,".
1094 (12) Code Section 36-36-16, relating to procedures for annexation and referendum, in
1095 subsection (b), by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1096 (13) Code Section 36-36-112, relating to prohibition on a change in zoning or land use, by
1097 replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1098 (14) Code Section 36-36-115, relating to meetings of arbitration panel, duties, findings and
1099 recommendations, and compensation, in paragraph (a)(4), by replacing "however, that" with
1100 "however, that," and in paragraph (a)(6), by inserting "public" preceding "website".
1101 (15) Code Section 36-37-6, relating to disposition of municipal property generally, in
1102 division (a)(2)(B)(iv), by replacing "Create a website which posts:" with "Create a public
1103 website which posts" and in subsection (c), by replacing "however, that" with "however,
1104 that,".
S. B. 153
- 43 -

25 LC 39 4444
1105 (16) Code Section 36-41-3, relating to definitions regarding urban residential finance
1106 authorities for large municipalities, in paragraph (14), by replacing "The term 'real property'"
1107 with "Such term", in paragraph (16), by replacing "however, that" with "however, that," and
1108 by replacing "The term 'residential housing'" with "Such term", and in paragraph (17), by
1109 replacing "The term 'security interest'" with "Such term".
1110 (17) Code Section 36-45-20, relating to training course regarding clerk of the governing
1111 authority of a municipality, in subsection (a), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used
1112 in".
1113 (18) Code Section 36-60-6, relating to utilization of federal work authorization program,
1114 "employee" defined, issuance of license, evidence of state licensure, annual reporting,
1115 standardized form affidavit, violation, and investigations, in subsection (b), by replacing "For
1116 purposes of" with "As used in" and in subsection (f), by inserting "public" preceding
1117 "website".
1118 (19) Code Section 36-60-15.1, relating to operation and maintenance of water treatment
1119 systems by private entities, by replacing "For purposes of this Code section, 'applicant'
1120 means" with "As used in this Code section, the term 'applicant' means".
1121 (20) Code Section 36-60-17, relating to water supplier's cut off of water to property because
1122 of indebtedness of prior owner, occupant, or lessee prohibited, records required, statement
1123 of past due amounts, and limited liens for unpaid charges for water, gas, sewerage service,
1124 or electricity, in subparagraph (c)(1)(D), by replacing "e-mail" with "email".
1125 (21) Code Section 36-60-19, relating to dispatch centers, required training for
1126 communications officers, exceptions, and penalty for noncompliance, in subsection (a), by
1127 replacing "(TDD's)" with "(TDDs)" each time the term appears.
1128 (22) Code Section 36-60-21, relating to contracts with private companies to construct and
1129 operate private toll roads and bridges to facilitate public transportation without additional tax
1130 revenues, in subsection (d), by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
S. B. 153
- 44 -

25 LC 39 4444
1131 (23) Code Section 36-60-24, relating to sale or use or ignition of consumer fireworks
1132 products, in subsection (f), by replacing "For purposes of this subsection," with "As used in
1133 this Code section," and by replacing "provided" with "set forth".
1134 (24) Code Section 36-60-29, relating to limitation on decreasing funding for municipal
1135 police force and exceptions, in paragraph (c)(3), by inserting "public" preceding "website".
1136 (25) Code Section 36-61-4, relating to encouragement of private enterprise, in
1137 subparagraph (b)(3)(B), by inserting "public" preceding "websites".
1138 (26) Code Section 36-63-2, relating to purpose of chapter regarding resource recovery
1139 development authorities, in subsection (b), by replacing "however," with "however, that".
1140 (27) Code Section 36-63-4, relating to definitions regarding resource recovery development
1141 authorities, in paragraph (10), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in".
1142 (28) Code Section 36-63-8, relating to powers of authority generally, in paragraph (a)(6),
1143 by replacing "however," with "however, that".
1144 (29) Code Section 36-66-3, relating to definitions regarding zoning procedures, in
1145 paragraph (1.1), by replacing "powers including" with "powers, including" and in
1146 paragraph (5), by replacing "The term" with "Such term".
1147 (30) Code Section 36-66-4, relating to hearings on proposed zoning decisions, notice of
1148 hearing, nongovernmental initiated actions, reconsideration of defeated actions, and
1149 procedure on zoning, in subsection (a), by replacing "this Code Section." with "this Code
1150 section.".
1151 (31) Code Section 36-66C-7, relating to requirements of authority following receipt of
1152 application, notification of time lapse, consolidated application, limitation on installation
1153 locations and permits, reconditioning work, time restrictions, imminent risk to public safety,
1154 repair of damage, and delivery of notice or decision, in paragraph (j)(8), by replacing
1155 "Title 36" with "this title" and in paragraph (m)(4), by replacing "120 days written notice"
1156 with "120 days' written notice".
S. B. 153
- 45 -

25 LC 39 4444
1157 (32) Code Section 36-70-2, relating to definitions regarding coordinated and comprehensive
1158 planning and service delivery by counties and municipalities, in paragraph (4), by deleting
1159 "of the State of Georgia created pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 8 of Title 50" and in
1160 paragraph (5.2), by replacing "The term" with "Such term".
1161 (33) Code Section 36-70-21, as effective on January 1, 2026, relating to implementation
1162 agreements, in paragraph (a)(1), by replacing "December 31st" with "December 31".
1163 (34) Code Section 36-70-22, as effective on January 1, 2026, relating to date for process
1164 initiation and notice to municipalities and counties impacted, in paragraph (a)(1), by
1165 replacing "April 1st" with "April 1" and by replacing "July 1st" with "July 1".
1166 (35) Code Section 36-70-22.1, as effective on January 1, 2026, relating to response
1167 proposals, in subsection (a), by deleting ", and" following "Code Section 36-70-23" and by
1168 replacing "all such factual" with "all factual".
1169 (36) Code Section 36-70-25.2, as effective on January 1, 2026, relating to nonbinding
1170 arbitration process, in paragraph (b)(1), by replacing "the 180th day" with "180 days".
1171 (37) Code Section 36-70-25.3, as effective on January 1, 2026, relating to judicial resolution
1172 of certain disputes, in paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2) and subsection (b), by replacing
1173 "non-binding" with "nonbinding".
1174 (38) Code Section 36-72-2, relating to definitions regarding abandoned cemeteries and
1175 burial grounds, in paragraph (3), by replacing "The term" with "Such term".
1176 (39) Code Section 36-76-2, relating to definitions regarding expedited franchising of cable
1177 and video services, in subparagraph (8)(A), by replacing "however, that" with "however,
1178 that,", in subparagraph (8)(E), by replacing "Internet" with "internet" each time the term
1179 appears, and in paragraph (17), by replacing "This term" with "Such term".
1180 (40) Code Section 36-76-4, relating to application process for the issuance of a state
1181 franchise and fees, in paragraph (c)(2), by replacing "geographical area" with "geographic
1182 area" and in paragraph (g)(8), by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
S. B. 153
- 46 -

25 LC 39 4444
1183 (41) Code Section 36-80-16.1, relating to the PILOT Restriction Act, payments in lieu of
1184 taxes defined, and financing capital projects, in the undesignated text at the end of
1185 subsection (b), by replacing "The term 'payments in lieu of taxes'" with "Such term".
1186 (42) Code Section 36-80-17, relating to authorization to contract for utility services and
1187 conditions and limitations, in subsection (a), by replacing "the term 'local authority' does"
1188 with "such term does".
1189 (43) Code Section 36-80-19, relating to general codification of ordinances and resolutions,
1190 publication and availability of code, and official state repository for general codifications,
1191 in paragraph (d)(1), by replacing "Internet" with "internet".
1192 (44) Code Section 36-80-25, relating to financing of public projects by local entities, in
1193 subsection (a), by replacing "health care" with "healthcare".
1194 (45) Code Section 36-80-26, relating to multi-county community improvement districts for
1195 transit projects, in the introductory language of subsection (a), by replacing "For purposes
1196 of" with "As used in" and in subsection (b), by replacing "multi-county" with "multicounty".
1197 (46) Code Section 36-81-2, relating to definitions regarding local government budgets and
1198 audits, in paragraph (7), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in" and in
1199 paragraph (16), by replacing "For purposes of this paragraph, 'county' includes" with "As
1200 used in this paragraph, the term 'county' includes".
1201 (47) Code Section 36-82-1, relating to election for bonded debt, right to sell bonds at
1202 discount, advertisements as binding statements of intention, use of surpluses, meetings open
1203 to public, and refunding, in subsection (f), by replacing "however," with "however, that".
1204 (48) Code Section 36-82-60, relating to short title regarding revenue bonds, by inserting
1205 "shall be known and" preceding "may be cited".
1206 (49) Code Section 36-82-75, relating to duty of district attorney or Attorney General to file
1207 petition, order to show cause, service of petition and order, and answer, by replacing
1208 "however," with "however, that".
S. B. 153
- 47 -

25 LC 39 4444
1209 (50) Code Section 36-82-182, relating to definitions regarding the "Georgia Allocation
1210 System," in paragraph (3), by replacing "For purposes of this article, the term 'bonds'" with
1211 "Such term" and in paragraph (5), by replacing "The term 'business day'" with "Such term".
1212 (51) Code Section 36-82-240, relating to definitions regarding commercial paper notes from
1213 government, in paragraph (2), by replacing "The term 'governmental entity' does not include
1214 'state authorities' as defined in paragraph (9) of Code Section 50-17-21." with "Such term
1215 does not include state authorities as defined in Code Section 50-17-21.".
1216 (52) Code Section 36-85-2, relating to formation, functions, counties and municipalities as
1217 separate classes, agreements creating agencies, and files of administrator are sole property
1218 of agency, in subsection (b), by replacing "however," with "however, that,".
1219 (53) Code Section 36-91-20, relating to written contract required, advertising, competitive
1220 sealed bidding, timing of addendums, and prequalification, in paragraph (b)(1), by inserting
1221 "public" preceding "website" and "websites" and in paragraph (b)(3), by replacing "Internet"
1222 with "internet" each time the term appears.
1223 (54) Code Section 36-91-21, relating to competitive award requirements, in
1224 paragraph (b)(4), by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1225 (55) Code Section 36-91-50, relating to projects requiring bid bonds, revocation of bids, and
1226 surety, in subsection (c), by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1227 (56) Code Section 36-91-102, relating to planning, finance, construction, acquisition,
1228 leasing, operation, and maintenance of projects, implementation, and lobbying restrictions,
1229 in paragraph (c)(2), by inserting "public" preceding "websites".
1230 SECTION 37.
1231 Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to mental health, is amended in:
1232 (1) Code Section 37-2-6.5, relating to cessation of operations by community service board,
1233 notification, and continuation of operations by successor board, county board of health, or
1234 outside manager, in paragraph (b)(2), by deleting "paragraph (1) of".
S. B. 153
- 48 -

25 LC 39 4444
1235 (2) Code Section 37-2-11, relating to allocation of available funds for services, recipients
1236 to meet minimum standards, accounting for fees generated by providers, and discrimination
1237 in providing services prohibited, in subsection (b), by replacing "Code Section 37-3-6.1,"
1238 with "Code Section 37-2-6.1,".
1239 (3) Code Section 37-7-167, relating to right of patient to examine his records and to request
1240 correction of inaccuracies, promulgation of rules and regulations, and judicial supervision
1241 of files and records relating to proceedings under this chapter, in subsection (d), by inserting
1242 "of subsection (a)" following "paragraphs (7) and (8)".
1243 SECTION 38.
1244 Reserved.
1245 SECTION 39.
1246 Reserved.
1247 SECTION 40.
1248 Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to motor vehicles and traffic, is
1249 amended in:
1250 (1) Code Section 40-1-221, relating to assumption of liability and insurance, in
1251 paragraph (c)(4), by replacing "car sharing" with "car-sharing" and in subsection (f), by
1252 replacing "car-sharing"with "peer-to-peer car-sharing".
1253 (2) Code Section 40-2-20, relating to registration and license requirements, certificate of
1254 registration and temporary operating permit, and two-year registration option for new motor
1255 vehicles, in subsection (d), by inserting a comma following "taxes".
1256 (3) Code Section 40-5-100, relating to application, contents of card, prohibition on
1257 possession of more than one card, and optional contributions to and participation in voluntary
S. B. 153
- 49 -

25 LC 39 4444
1258 programs, in paragraph (f)(2), by replacing "a identification card" with "an identification
1259 card".
1260 (4) Code Section 40-14-18, relating to enforcement of speed limit in school zones with
1261 recorded images, civil monetary penalty, and consequences for failure to pay penalty, in the
1262 introductory language of subsection (h), by inserting "of this Code section" following
1263 "subsection (g)".
1264 (5) Code Section 40-16-8, which is reserved, by designating said Code section as repealed.
1265 SECTION 41.
1266 Reserved.
1267 SECTION 42.
1268 Title 42 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to penal institutions, is amended
1269 in:
1270 (1) Code Section 42-1-12, relating to the State Sexual Offender Registry, in
1271 paragraph (a)(6.1), by replacing "paragraph (2)" with "paragraph (3)".
1272 (2) Code Section 42-5-64, relating to educational programming and information provided
1273 to released prisoners, in subsection (f), by replacing "a personal identification card" with "an
1274 identification card".
1275 SECTION 43.
1276 Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to professions and businesses,
1277 is amended in:
1278 (1) Code Section 43-1-34, relating to licenses for transitioning members of the armed forces,
1279 in the introductory language of paragraph (d)(1), by replacing "described herein," with "set
1280 forth in this Code section,".
S. B. 153
- 50 -

25 LC 39 4444
1281 (2) Code Section 43-1-35, relating to expedited license by endorsement for spouses of active
1282 or transitioning members of the armed forces and license by endorsement for certain
1283 professions, in the introductory language of subsection (c), by replacing "or a law" with "or
1284 law" and by replacing "individual has:" with "individual:".
1285 (3) Code Section 43-6-11, relating to qualifications of applicants for auctioneer's license, in
1286 subsection (d), by inserting "diploma" following "(HSE)".
1287 (4) Code Section 43-11-2.1, relating to board authority, appointment, powers, and duties of
1288 executive director and meetings, in subsection (b), by replacing "Chapter 1 of Title 43" with
1289 "Chapter 1 of this title".
1290 (5) Code Section 43-15-2, relating to definitions regarding professional engineers and land
1291 surveyors, in paragraph (5.1), by replacing "'Executive Director'" with "'Executive director'".
1292 (6) Code Section 43-24A-19, relating to exceptions regarding the "Georgia Massage
1293 Therapy Practice Act," in paragraph (a)(1), by replacing "Title 43" with "this title".
1294 (7) Code Section 43-26-10, relating to practicing without a license prohibited, in
1295 paragraph (4), by replacing "so to practice" with "to practice".
1296 (8) Code Section 43-27-2, relating to State Board of Long-Term Care Facility
1297 Administrators and members, in the introductory language of subsection (a), by replacing
1298 "eleven" with "11".
1299 (9) Code Section 43-28-21, relating to text of the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact,
1300 in Section 2A, by replacing "10 U.S.C. Chapter 1209 and Section 1211" with "10 U.S.C.
1301 Chapters 1209 and 1211".
1302 (10) Code Section 43-33-18, relating to refusal to grant or restore licenses, discipline of
1303 licensees, suspension, revocation, or restriction of licenses, and immunity for violation
1304 reporters, in the introductory language of subparagraph (a)(2)(A), division (a)(2)(A)(i), and
1305 subparagraph (a)(2)(E), by replacing "Title 43" with "this title" each time the term appears.
S. B. 153
- 51 -

25 LC 39 4444
1306 (11) Code Section 43-33-31, relating to ratification and text of the Physical Therapy
1307 Licensure Compact, in Section 2(1), by replacing "10 U.S.C. Section 1209 and 1211" with
1308 "10 U.S.C. Chapters 1209 and 1211".
1309 (12) Code Section 43-34-25, relating to delegation of certain medical acts to advanced
1310 practice registered nurse, construction and limitations of such delegation, conditions of nurse
1311 protocol, and issuance of prescription drug orders, in paragraph (g)(10), by replacing "and
1312 who" with "who", in paragraph (g.1)(2), by deleting the comma following "body", and in
1313 subparagraph (m)(2)(C), by deleting "that".
1314 (13) Code Section 43-34-103, relating to application for licensure as a physician assistant,
1315 authorized delegated authority, and prohibited acts, in paragraph (c)(4), by deleting "that".
1316 (14) Code Section 43-34-290, relating to confidentiality of records regarding pain
1317 management clinics, by replacing "Chapter 34 of Title 43" with "this chapter".
1318 (15) Code Section 43-41-8, relating to eligibility for licensure without examination,
1319 reciprocity, and burden upon applicant, in paragraph (a)(2), by replacing "their" with "his or
1320 her".
1321 (16) Code Section 43-41-18, relating to certain military specialties or certifications entitle
1322 persons to obtain certain professional licenses, in subsections (b) and (c), by replacing
1323 "residential light-commercial" with "residential-light commercial" each time the phrase
1324 appears.
1325 (17) Chapters 42 and 48, which are repealed, by designating said chapters as reserved.
1326 (18) Code Section 43-44-31, relating to text of the Audiology and Speech-Language
1327 Pathology Interstate Compact, in Section 2(1), by replacing "10 U.S.C. Section 1209 and
1328 1211" with "10 U.S.C. Chapters 1209 and 1211".
1329 (19) Code Section 43-50-44, relating to exemptions from article regarding licensing of
1330 veterinarians and veterinary technicians, in paragraph (19), by replacing "laws;" with "laws;
1331 or".
S. B. 153
- 52 -

25 LC 39 4444
1332 SECTION 44.
1333 Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to property, is amended in:
1334 (1) Code Section 44-2-39, relating to adoption of rules and regulations and standardization,
1335 in paragraph (b)(1), by replacing "personal identification card" with "identification card".
1336 (2) Code Section 44-3-106, relating to powers and responsibilities of condominium
1337 associations and tort actions, in paragraph (a)(4), by replacing "complied with or" with
1338 "complied with; or".
1339 (3) Code Section 44-3-230, relating to frequency of meetings and notice regarding property
1340 owners' associations, in subsection (b), by replacing "may called" with "may be called".
1341 (4) Code Section 44-3-231, relating to powers and duties of property owners' associations
1342 and legal actions against agent or employee of association, in paragraph (a)(4), by replacing
1343 "compiled with or" with "complied with; or".
1344 (5) Code Section 44-5-60, relating to effect of zoning laws, covenants and scenic easements
1345 for use of public, renewal of certain covenants, and costs, in subsection (b), by replacing
1346 "provided, however, that" with "provided, however, that," and in paragraph (d)(6), by
1347 replacing "15 individuals plots" with "15 individual plots".
1348 (6) Code Section 44-7-55, relating to judgment, writ of possession, landlord's liability for
1349 wrongful conduct, distribution of funds paid into court, and personal property, by revising
1350 subsection (e) as follows:
1351 "(e) Nothing in this Code section shall require a sheriff, constable, or marshal to execute
1352 a writ of possession within 30 days from the issuance of any order granting a writ of
1353 possession, or the issuance, application, or request for the execution of the writ of
1354 possession; provided, however, that, in the event the sheriff, sheriff deputy sheriff,
1355 constable, or marshal is unable to execute the writ within 14 days from the landlord's
1356 application or request for such execution, the landlord shall be entitled to utilize the
1357 services of an off-duty sheriff, sheriff deputy sheriff, constable, marshal, or other individual
1358 certified by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council having authority
S. B. 153
- 53 -

25 LC 39 4444
1359 within the jurisdiction wherein the premises lie to execute such writ at the landlord's sole
1360 cost and expense. The sheriff, sheriff deputy sheriff, constable, or marshal shall maintain
1361 a list of authorized off-duty sheriffs, sheriff deputies deputy sheriffs, constables, marshals,
1362 and other individuals certified by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training
1363 Council and make the same available upon request by the landlord. The sheriff, sheriff
1364 deputy sheriff, constable, or marshal shall maintain administrative authority over any
1365 persons executing writs under this subsection. The landlord shall provide written notice
1366 to the sheriff, sheriff deputy sheriff, constable, or marshal of the date and time of the
1367 execution of the writ by such off-duty sheriff, sheriff deputy sheriff, constable, marshal,
1368 or other individuals individual certified by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and
1369 Training Council at least five calendar days in advance of such execution in order to permit
1370 the sheriff, sheriff deputy sheriff, constable, or marshal to note the same within their his or
1371 her own records."
1372 (7) Code Section 44-11-30, relating to manner of ejecting intruders, affidavit, ejection by
1373 sheriff and other peace officers, and counteraffidavit, by replacing "sheriff deputy," with
1374 "deputy sheriff," each time the term appears.
1375 (8) Code Section 43-11-31, relating to sheriff and other peace officers competent to
1376 administer oath to person in possession, by replacing "sheriff deputy," with "deputy sheriff,".
1377 (9) Code Section 44-11-32, relating to procedure on submission of counteraffidavit, trial,
1378 nonmeritorious submission, and appeal, by deleting the subsection (a) designation and in
1379 paragraphs (1) and (2), by replacing "sheriff deputy," with "deputy sheriff," each time the
1380 term appears.
1381 (10) Code Section 44-11-33, relating to issuance of writ of possession, fi. fa. for costs, and
1382 presentation to law enforcement, by replacing "44-11-32, finds" with "44-11-32 finds".
1383 (11) Code Section 44-12-231, relating to enforcement of article regarding disposition of
1384 unclaimed property and properties not paid over on a timely basis, in subsection (b), by
1385 replacing "48-3-1" with "48-3-3".
S. B. 153
- 54 -

25 LC 39 4444
1386 SECTION 45.
1387 Title 45 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to public officers and employees,
1388 is amended in:
1389 (1) Code Section 45-9-81, relating to definitions regarding the Georgia State Indemnification
1390 Fund, in paragraph (1), by repealing and reserving said paragraph.
1391 (2) Code Section 45-17-8, relating to powers and duties generally of notaries public, in
1392 subsection (e), by replacing "personal identification card" with "identification card".
1393 (3) Code Section 45-19-44, relating to unlawful practices punishable by civil fine, at the end
1394 of the introductory language of paragraph (a)(5), by replacing the semicolon with a colon.
1395 SECTION 46.
1396 Title 46 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to public utilities and public
1397 transportation, is amended in:
1398 (1) Code Section 46-2-8, relating to payment of salaries and expenses by commission,
1399 appropriations for salaries and expenses, and designation of Public Service Commission
1400 Fund, by replacing "for Commissioners," with "for the Commissioners,".
1401 (2) Code Section 46-2-23.1, relating to "alternative form of regulation" defined, filing,
1402 notice, approval, and release of interstate pipeline capacity, in subparagraph (i)(1)(C), by
1403 replacing "that if" with "that, if".
1404 (3) Code Section 46-2-26.3, relating to recovery of costs of conversion from oil-burning to
1405 coal-burning generating facility, filing of request, public hearing, determination of rate, and
1406 adjustments, in subsection (a), by replacing "Public Service Commission" with "commission"
1407 and by revising subsection (b) as follows:
1408 "(b) As used in this Code section, the term For the purposes of this Code section, the
1409 following words or terms shall have the following meanings:
1410 (1) 'Coal' shall mean means coal used as a primary energy source.
1411 (2) 'Commission' shall mean the Georgia Public Service Commission.
S. B. 153
- 55 -

25 LC 39 4444
1412 (3)(2)(A) 'Cost of conversion' shall mean means costs as determined by the
1413 commission to be reasonable and necessary for the conversion of an oil-burning electric
1414 generating facility to the burning of coal. Such costs shall include, but not be limited
1415 to, engineering, administrative, and legal costs,; the cost of environmental studies and
1416 control equipment, coal-handling and storage equipment, including rail facilities,
1417 equipment and facilities necessary to permit the combustion of coal,; the cost of
1418 retrofitting or refurbishing boilers to permit the combustion of coal,; the cost of on-site
1419 and off-site facilities for handling, storing, and disposing of wastes resulting from the
1420 combustion of coal,; and the cost of all other facilities reasonable and necessary to
1421 allow the conversion of an oil-burning electric generating facility to burn coal. Such
1422 costs shall also include the reasonable cost of capital for such conversion and for
1423 carrying the cost of such conversion until such costs are recovered as provided in this
1424 Code section. In no case shall cost of conversion such term include any costs incurred
1425 pursuant to an expansion of an electric generating facility's generating capacity above
1426 the generating capacity of said facility that existed prior to the conversion from oil to
1427 coal.
1428 (B) Such term 'Cost of conversion' shall not include the amount financed by the
1429 company through tax-exempt pollution control bonds, if any, of any portion of the
1430 project certified by the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural
1431 Resources, or other agency vested with similar authority, to be a pollution control
1432 facility and therefore eligible for financing under Section 103 of the Internal Revenue
1433 Code and the regulations thereunder or other similar law or regulation now or hereafter
1434 adopted.
1435 (4)(3) 'Fuel cost savings' shall mean means the amount of fuel savings to be obtained by
1436 operating the facility converted from oil to coal-fired operation during the facility's first
1437 full 12 months of operation using coal as its primary fuel as compared to the operation
1438 of such facility on oil, had it been so operated, during the same 12 month period.
S. B. 153
- 56 -

25 LC 39 4444
1439 (5)(4) 'Utility' shall mean means any retail supplier of electricity subject to the
1440 rate-making jurisdiction of the commission."
1441 (4) Code Section 46-2-26.5, relating to gas supply plans and adjustment factors, filings and
1442 hearing procedures, and recovery of purchase gas cost, by deleting paragraph (a)(2) and
1443 redesignating paragraphs (a)(3) through (a)(8) as paragraphs (a)(2) through (a)(7),
1444 respectively.
1445 (5) Code Section 46-2-28, relating to procedure for issuance of stocks, bonds, notes, or other
1446 debt by companies under commission's jurisdiction and exemptions, in the introductory
1447 language of subsection (g), by deleting "paragraph (10) of".
1448 (6) Code Section 46-3-1, relating to the short title regarding allocation of territorial rights
1449 to electric suppliers, by inserting "and may be cited" following "known".
1450 (7) Code Section 46-3-3, relating to definitions regarding allocation of territorial rights to
1451 electric suppliers, in paragraph (2), by replacing "has the meaning provided by paragraph (3)
1452 of" with "shall have the same meaning as set forth in".
1453 (8) Code Section 46-3-4, relating to assignment or declaration as unassigned areas-B of
1454 geographic areas outside municipal limits as of March 29, 1973, in paragraph (3), by
1455 replacing "provided that if" with "provided that, if" and by replacing "however, that" with
1456 "however, that,".
1457 (9) Code Section 46-3-7, relating to assignment and unassignment of geographic areas
1458 annexed to municipalities after March 29, 1973, in subparagraphs (2)(A) and (2)(D), by
1459 replacing "provided that" with "provided that,".
1460 (10) Code Section 46-3-32, relating to definitions regarding high-voltage safety, in
1461 paragraph (3), by replacing "this term" with "such term".
1462 (11) Code Section 46-3-33, relating to required conditions for commencing work within ten
1463 feet of high-voltage line, in the introductory language, by deleting "as defined in
1464 paragraph (6) of Code Section 46-3-32".
S. B. 153
- 57 -

25 LC 39 4444
1465 (12) Code Section 46-3-52, relating to jurisdiction of commission over cogeneration facility
1466 the energy from which is used solely by operator, by deleting paragraph (3) and
1467 redesignating paragraphs (4) through (12) as paragraphs (3) through (11), respectively.
1468 (13) Code Section 46-3-62, relating to definitions regarding solar power free-market
1469 financing, in paragraph (5), by replacing "has the same meaning as provided in paragraph (3)
1470 of" with "shall have the same meaning as set forth in" and in paragraph (9), by replacing "has
1471 the same meaning as provided in paragraph (6) of" with "shall have the same meaning as set
1472 forth in".
1473 (14) Code Section 46-3-66, relating to construction and applicability, in subsections (d) and
1474 (e), by replacing "the effective date of this part" with "July 1, 2015,".
1475 (15) Code Section 46-3-115, relating terms of authority members generally and time of
1476 meeting of election committee prior to annual meeting of authority, by replacing "provided
1477 that" with "provided that,".
1478 (16) Code Section 46-3-120, relating to quorum of authority, action by majority vote, and
1479 adjournment of meetings at which less than a majority is present, by replacing "provided
1480 that" with "provided that,".
1481 (17) Code Section 46-3-170, relating to short title regarding general provisions relative to
1482 electric membership corporations and foreign electric cooperatives, by replacing "article
1483 may" with "article shall be known and may".
1484 (18) Code Section 46-3-263, relating to notice of members' meetings, in subsection (a), by
1485 replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1486 (19) Code Section 46-3-322, relating to filing articles of incorporation, issuance of
1487 certificate of incorporation, forwarding of copy of certificate to clerk of superior court,
1488 rejection of articles of incorporation, publication of notice, and commencement of corporate
1489 existence, in paragraph (e)(1), by inserting quotation marks at the beginning and end of the
1490 form, and by revising paragraph (c)(4) as follows:
S. B. 153
- 58 -

25 LC 39 4444
1491 "(4) A letter addressed to the publisher of a newspaper which is the official organ of the
1492 county where the initial registered office of the electric membership corporation is to be
1493 located or which is a newspaper of general circulation published within that county
1494 whose most recently published annual statement of ownership and circulation reflects a
1495 minimum of 60 percent paid circulation. This letter shall contain a notice to be published
1496 four times in the newspaper and shall be in substantially the following form:
1497 '_______________________________________
1498 _______________________________________
1499 _______________________________________
1500 (name and address of the newspaper designated
1501 by the incorporator or incorporators or
1502 his or their representative thereof)
1503 Dear Sirs:
1504 You are requested to publish, four times, a notice in the following form:
1505 '"_____________________ (name of electric membership corporation) has been duly
1506 incorporated on _____________________ (month, day, and year to be inserted by the
1507 Secretary of State), by the issuance of a certificate of incorporation by the Secretary
1508 of State in accordance with the applicable provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 3 of Title
1509 46, the "'Georgia Electric Membership Corporation Act."' The initial registered office
1510 of the electric membership corporation is located at _____________________
1511 (address of registered office) and its initial registered agent at such address is
1512 ______________________ (name of agent).'"
1513 Enclosed is a (check, draft, or money order) in the amount of $60.00 in payment of the
1514 costs of publishing this notice.
1515 Very truly yours,
S. B. 153
- 59 -

25 LC 39 4444
1516 ____________________________________
1517 ____________________________________
1518 ____________________________________
1519 (Name and address of incorporator or
1520 incorporators or his or their representative thereof)'"
1521 (20) Code Section 46-3-363, relating to obtaining of certificate from Secretary of State upon
1522 amendment of name of electric membership corporation, filing articles of amendment,
1523 issuance of certificate of amendment, forwarding of copy of certificate to superior court,
1524 rejection of articles of amendment, and publication of notice, by revising paragraph (c)(4)
1525 as follows:
1526 "(4) A letter addressed to the publisher of a newspaper which is the official organ of the
1527 county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is located or
1528 which is a newspaper of general circulation published within that county whose most
1529 recently published annual statement of ownership and circulation reflects a minimum of
1530 60 percent paid circulation. This letter shall contain a notice to be published four times
1531 in the newspaper and shall be in substantially the following form:
1532 '_______________________________
1533 _______________________________
1534 _______________________________
1535 (Name and address of the newspaper
1536 designated by the electric
1537 membership corporation)
1538 Dear Sirs:
1539 You are requested to publish, four times, a notice in the following form:
1540 '"The Articles of Incorporation of ______________________ (name of electric
1541 membership corporation) have been duly amended on ______________, ____
S. B. 153
- 60 -

25 LC 39 4444
1542 (month, day, and year to be inserted by the Secretary of State), by the issuance of a
1543 certificate of amendment by the Secretary of State, in accordance with the applicable
1544 provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 3 of Title 46, the "'Georgia Electric Membership
1545 Corporation Act."'"
1546 Enclosed is a (check, draft, or money order) in the amount of $60.00 in payment of the
1547 cost of publishing this notice.
1548 Very truly yours,
1549 ___________________________
1550 ___________________________
1551 ___________________________
1552 (Name and address of the electric
1553 membership corporation
1554 or its representative)'"
1555 (21) Code Section 46-3-383, relating to contents of articles of merger or articles of
1556 consolidation, obtaining of certificate from Secretary of State upon use of new name, and
1557 procedures involving filing, issuance, rejection, and publication of articles of merger or
1558 articles of consolidation, by revising paragraph (d)(4) as follows:
1559 "(4) A letter addressed to the publisher of a newspaper which is the official organ of the
1560 county where the registered office of the surviving or new electric membership
1561 corporation is to be located or which is a newspaper of general circulation published
1562 within that county whose most recently published annual statement of ownership and
1563 circulation reflects a minimum of 60 percent paid circulation. This letter shall contain
1564 a notice to be published four times in the newspaper and shall be in substantially the
1565 following form:
1566 '_______________________________________
1567 _______________________________________
S. B. 153
- 61 -

25 LC 39 4444
1568 _______________________________________
1569 (name and address of the newspaper designated
1570 by the merging or consolidating
1571 electric membership corporations)
1572 Dear Sirs:
1573 You are requested to publish, four times, a notice in the following form:
1574 '"A (merger) (consolidation) (has been) (will be) effected by and between
1575 _______________________ (name and state of incorporation of each of the
1576 constituent electric membership corporations) on _______________________
1577 (month, day, and year to be inserted by the Secretary of State) by the issuance of a
1578 certificate of (merger) (consolidation) by the Secretary of State, in accordance with
1579 the applicable provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 3 of Title 46, the "'Georgia Electric
1580 Membership Corporation Act."' The name of the (surviving electric membership
1581 corporation in the merger) (new electric membership corporation resulting from the
1582 consolidation) (is) (will be) _______________________ (set forth the name and state
1583 of incorporation of the surviving electric membership corporation or new electric
1584 membership corporation, as the case may be), the registered office of which (is) (will
1585 be) located at _______________________ (address of registered office).'"
1586 Enclosed is a (check, draft, or money order) in the amount of $60.00 in payment of the
1587 cost of publishing this notice.
1588 Very truly yours,
1589 ____________________________
1590 ____________________________
S. B. 153
- 62 -

25 LC 39 4444
1591 ____________________________
1592 (Name and address of merging
1593 or consolidating electric
1594 membership corporations
1595 or their representative)'"
1596 (22) Code Section 46-3-423, relating to procedure after filing statement of intent to dissolve,
1597 by revising subsection (a) as follows:
1598 "(a) The electric membership corporation shall immediately cause notice of its intent to
1599 dissolve to be published in a newspaper which is the official organ of the county where the
1600 registered office of the electric membership corporation is located or which is a newspaper
1601 of general circulation published within that county whose most recently published annual
1602 statement of ownership and circulation reflects a minimum of 60 percent paid circulation.
1603 This notice shall be published four times in the newspaper and shall be in substantially the
1604 following form:
1605 'A Statement of Intent to Dissolve _____________________ (name of electric
1606 membership corporation), a Georgia electric membership corporation with registered
1607 office at _____________________ (address of registered office), has been delivered to
1608 the Secretary of State by said electric membership corporation and filed by him on
1609 ______________, ____ (month, day, and year), in accordance with the applicable
1610 provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 3 of Title 46, the '"Georgia Electric Membership
1611 Corporation Act."'"
1612 (23) Code Section 46-3-468, relating to application for reinstatement of certificate of
1613 authority, by revising subsection (c) as follows:
1614 "(c) The application for reinstatement shall be in substantially the following form:
1615 'Application for Reinstatement of
1616 Certificate of Authority
S. B. 153
- 63 -

25 LC 39 4444
1617 To: The Secretary of State
1618 Atlanta, Georgia
1619 Pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 46-3-468, the undersigned foreign electric
1620 cooperative hereby applies for a certificate of reinstatement of a foreign electric
1621 cooperative and, for that purpose, submits the following:
1622 First: The name of the foreign electric cooperative at the date of the certificate of
1623 revocation was _______________________.
1624 Second: The new name by which the foreign electric cooperative will hereafter be
1625 known is _______________________.
1626 Third: The certificate of authority to transact business in the State of Georgia was
1627 revoked on ______________ for failure to follow the requirements stated in Code
1628 Section 46-3-466.
1629 Fourth: The address, including street and number, of its registered office in Georgia is
1630 _______________________; and the name of its registered agent in Georgia at that
1631 address is _______________________.
1632 Fifth: The application is accompanied by all delinquent reports together with the filing
1633 fees and penalties required by Article 4 of Chapter 3 of Title 46, the '"Georgia Electric
1634 Membership Corporation Act.'"
1635 Date ______________, ____.
1636 __________________________
1637 (President or vice-president)
1638 __________________________
1639 (Secretary or assistant secretary)'"
S. B. 153
- 64 -

25 LC 39 4444
1640 (24) Code Section 46-3-480, relating to requirement of annual reports by electric
1641 membership corporation and foreign electric cooperative, in subsection (b), by replacing
1642 "however," with "provided, however, that".
1643 (25) Code Section 46-3A-1, relating to definitions regarding integrated resource planning,
1644 in the introductory language, by replacing "chapter:" with "chapter, the term:" and by
1645 deleting paragraph (2) and redesignating paragraphs (3) through (9) as paragraphs (2)
1646 through (8), respectively.
1647 (26) Code Section 46-3A-3, relating to actions prohibited without a certificate of public
1648 convenience and necessity, in the undesignated text at the end of subsection (b), by replacing
1649 "however," with "however, that".
1650 (27) Code Section 46-3A-10, relating to effect on rates of changed revenues and risks and
1651 basis and effect of commission decision, by replacing "however," with "however, that".
1652 (28) Code Section 46-4-85, relating to authority members and terms of office, by replacing
1653 "provided that" with "provided that,".
1654 (29) Code Section 46-4-90, relating to quorum and majority vote, by replacing "provided
1655 that" with "provided that,".
1656 (30) Code Section 46-4-152, relating to definitions regarding natural gas competition and
1657 deregulation, in paragraph (5), by replacing "The term control" with "Such term" and in
1658 paragraph (10.1), by replacing "defined" with "described".
1659 (31) Code Section 46-4-154, relating to notice of election, unbundling, rates, application
1660 requirements, and surcharge on interruptibles, in subsection (e), by replacing "medicare" with
1661 "Medicare" and by replacing "writeoffs" with "write-offs".
1662 (32) Code Section 46-4-158.2, relating to rules governing marketer's terms of service, in
1663 paragraph (8), by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1664 (33) Code Section 46-4-159, relating to standards of conduct for electing distribution
1665 companies and response to complaints, in paragraph (a)(1), by replacing "The term control"
S. B. 153
- 65 -

25 LC 39 4444
1666 with "Such term", in subparagraph (a)(3)(B), by replacing "the term marketer" with "such
1667 term", and in paragraph (b)(9), by replacing "however," with "provided, however, that".
1668 (34) Code Section 46-4-160, relating to commission's authority over certificated marketers,
1669 access to records, investigations and hearings, price summary, billing, violations, and
1670 slamming, in subsection (j), by replacing "phrase" with "term".
1671 (35) Code Section 46-5-1, relating to exercise of power of eminent domain by telephone
1672 companies, placement of posts and other fixtures, regulation of construction of fixtures,
1673 posts, and wires near railroad tracks, liability of telephone companies for damages, required
1674 information, and due compensation, in subparagraph (b)(1)(B) and paragraph (b)(7), by
1675 replacing "Georgia Public Service Commission" with "commission", in the introductory
1676 language of paragraph (b)(9), by replacing "Code section," with "Code section, the term", in
1677 paragraph (b)(12), by replacing "As used in this Code section," with "As used in this Code
1678 section, the term" and by replacing "however, that if" with "however, that, if", in
1679 paragraph (b)(13), by replacing "ten percent" with "10 percent", and in
1680 subparagraph (b)(19)(A), by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1681 (36) Code Section 46-5-2, relating to avoiding or attempting to avoid charges for use of
1682 telecommunication service, penalties, and computation of damages, in paragraph (b)(1), by
1683 replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1684 (37) Code Section 46-5-3, relating to making, possessing, selling, allowing use of, or
1685 publishing assembly plans for devices, equipment, or apparatus for committing theft of
1686 telecommunications service, or for concealing origin or destination of any
1687 telecommunication and compensatory damages, in paragraph (a)(3), by replacing "The term"
1688 with "Such term" and in paragraph (c)(1), by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1689 (38) Code Section 46-5-5, relating to inclusion of local exchanges 495 and 567 in area
1690 code 404, by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
S. B. 153
- 66 -

25 LC 39 4444
1691 (39) Code Section 46-5-26, relating to access to live telephone operator, in subsection (a),
1692 by replacing "For the purpose of this Code section," with "As used in this Code section, the
1693 term" and by replacing "dials '0'." with "dials '0.'"
1694 (40) Code Section 46-5-27, relating to telephone solicitation calls and do not call database,
1695 in subparagraph (b)(3)(B), by deleting "or" at the end and in subsection (n), by replacing
1696 "voice over internet protocol" with "Voice over Internet Protocol".
1697 (41) Code Section 46-5-28, relating to consent required for inclusion of subscribers' names
1698 or dialing numbers in a wireless telephone data base or a traditional telephone directory,
1699 exceptions, disclosure of wireless numbers to telemarketers prohibited, violations, and
1700 immunity of service suppliers for authorized disclosures, in paragraph (a)(3), by replacing
1701 "The term" with "Such term".
1702 (42) Code Section 46-5-30, relating to establishment, administration, and operation of
1703 state-wide dual party relay service and audible universal information access service, in
1704 subsection (c), by replacing "basis; however," with "basis; provided, however, that".
1705 (43) Code Section 46-5-60, relating to short title regarding rural telephone cooperatives, by
1706 replacing "part may" with "part shall be known and may".
1707 (44) Code Section 46-5-62, relating to definitions regarding rural telephone cooperatives,
1708 in paragraph (5), by replacing "This term" with "Such term".
1709 (45) Code Section 46-5-63, relating to powers of cooperatives generally, in paragraph (4.1),
1710 by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1711 (46) Code Section 46-5-75, relating to certificate of Secretary of State, by inserting quotation
1712 marks at the beginning and end of the form.
1713 (47) Code Section 46-5-93, relating to pledging or encumbering of property, assets, rights,
1714 and privileges of cooperative by board of directors to secure indebtedness to federal
1715 government, tax exemption for mortgages and deeds of trust, and sale, pledge, or
1716 encumbrance of property, in subsection (b), by replacing "provided that" with "provided
1717 that,".
S. B. 153
- 67 -

25 LC 39 4444
1718 (48) Code Section 46-5-122, relating to definitions regarding emergency telephone number
1719 9-1-1 system, in paragraph (5), by replacing "The term 'emergency 9-1-1 system'" with "Such
1720 term", in paragraph (7), by replacing "Georgia Public Service Commission" with
1721 "commission" and by replacing "The term 'exchange access facility'" with "Such term", in
1722 the undesignated text at the end of paragraph (12.1), by replacing "Internet" with "internet",
1723 in paragraph (17.1), by replacing "over the Internet" with "over the internet" and by replacing
1724 "Internet protocol" with "Internet Protocol", and in paragraph (19), by replacing "The term"
1725 with "Such term" each time the phrase appears.
1726 (49) Code Section 46-5-134.2, relating to prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charge, definitions,
1727 imposition of fee by localities, collection and remission of charges, and distribution of funds,
1728 in paragraph (g)(3), by replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in".
1729 (50) Code Section 46-5-162, relating to definitions regarding telecommunications and
1730 competition development, in the introductory language of paragraph (10), by replacing "For
1731 purposes of this article, there" with "There" and in paragraph (18), by replacing "For
1732 purposes of illustration, the term 'telecommunications services'" with "Such term".
1733 (51) Code Section 46-5-163, relating to certificates of authority, in subsection (f), by
1734 replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1735 (52) Code Section 46-5-165, relating to alternative regulation of rates, terms, and conditions,
1736 in subsection (a), by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1737 (53) Code Section 46-5-167, relating to Universal Access Fund, in paragraph (d)(1), by
1738 replacing "For purposes of" with "As used in" and in subsection (g), by replacing "Public
1739 Service Commission" with "commission".
1740 (54) Code Section 46-5-181, relating to definitions regarding the "Telecommunications
1741 Marketing Act of 1998," by revising said Code section as follows:
1742 "46-5-181.
1743 As used in this article, the terms 'local exchange company,' 'telecommunications company,'
1744 and 'telecommunications services' shall have the same meaning as provided in Code
S. B. 153
- 68 -

25 LC 39 4444
1745 Section 46-5-162; the term 'local exchange carrier' shall have the same meaning as 'local
1746 exchange company'; and the term 'long distance service' shall include interexchange
1747 inter-LATA telecommunications service and interexchange intra-LATA
1748 telecommunications service term:
1749 (1) 'Local exchange carrier' shall have the same meaning as the term 'local exchange
1750 company.'
1751 (2) 'Local exchange company' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
1752 Section 46-5-162.
1753 (3) 'Long distance service' includes interexchange inter-LATA telecommunications
1754 service and interexchange intra-LATA telecommunications service.
1755 (4) 'Telecommunications company' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
1756 Section 46-5-162.
1757 (5) 'Telecommunications services' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
1758 Section 46-5-162."
1759 (55) Code Section 46-5-221, relating to definitions regarding competitive emerging
1760 communications technologies, in subparagraph (1)(A), by replacing "Internet;" with
1761 "internet;", in the undesignated text at the end of paragraph (1), by replacing "For the
1762 purposes of this article, broadband service" with "Such term", and in paragraph (2), by
1763 replacing "Internet protocol" with "internet protocol".
1764 (56) Code Section 46-8-20, relating to exclusive power of commission to determine just and
1765 reasonable rates and charges, establishing rates and tariffs generally, and locating of depots
1766 and construction of freight and passenger buildings, in paragraph (b)(4), by replacing
1767 "provided that" with "provided that,".
1768 (57) Code Section 46-8-42, relating to certificate of incorporation, duration of corporate
1769 existence, and fee for issuance of certificate, in subsection (a), by inserting quotation marks
1770 at the beginning and end of the form.
S. B. 153
- 69 -

25 LC 39 4444
1771 (58) Code Section 46-8-100, relating to general powers regarding powers of railroad
1772 companies generally, in paragraph (3), by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1773 (59) Code Section 46-8-291, relating to consent and contributory negligence as defenses and
1774 comparative negligence as affecting amount of recovery, by replacing "provided that" with
1775 "provided that,".
1776 (60) Code Section 46-8-312, relating to service of process on lessor railroad company,
1777 generally, by replacing "however, that" with "however, that,".
1778 (61) Code Section 46-8-339, relating to authority of street, suburban, and interurban railroad
1779 companies to furnish steam for heating and power purposes and to lay and maintain
1780 steampipes, by replacing "provided that" with "provided that,".
1781 (62) Code Section 46-9-42, relating to effect of strike by carrier's employees on carrier's
1782 duty to transport goods, by replacing "provided that" with "provided that,".
1783 (63) Code Section 46-9-48, relating to adjustment and payment by common carriers of
1784 claims for loss of property or overcharge for freight and effect of failure by common carrier
1785 to adjust and pay claim, by replacing "provided that" with "provided that,".
1786 (64) Code Section 46-9-50, relating to weighing of railroad cars by certified public weighers
1787 and manner of weighing cars, in subsection (b), by replacing "provided that when" with
1788 "provided that, when".
1789 (65) Code Section 46-9-138, relating to granting of annual passes by common carriers to
1790 sheriffs and their deputies, by replacing "provided that the term 'sheriffs and their lawful
1791 deputies,' as used in this Code section, means" with "provided that, as used in this Code
1792 section, the term 'sheriffs and their lawful deputies' means".
1793 (66) Code Section 46-9-212, relating to switching off and delivering to connecting roads all
1794 cars consigned to points over or beyond the connecting roads, in subsection (b), by replacing
1795 "provided that" with "provided that,".
1796 (67) Code Section 46-9-230, relating to manner of incorporation of express companies, by
1797 inserting quotation marks at the beginning and end of the certificate form.
S. B. 153
- 70 -

25 LC 39 4444
1798 (68) Code Section 46-9-290, relating to Designated Georgia Rail Passenger Corridors, in
1799 paragraph (b)(2), by replacing "For the purposes of this subsection, 'high speed rail' is
1800 defined as involving" with "As used in this subsection, the term 'high speed rail' means".
1801 (69) Chapters 10 and 11, which are reserved, by designating said chapters as repealed.
1802 (70) The following Code sections, by replacing "Public Service Commission" and "Georgia
1803 Public Service Commission" with "commission" each time the term appears:
1804 (A) Code Section 46-1-2, relating to measure of damages for wrongs and injuries by
1805 railroad companies generally and venue for actions against railroad companies and electric
1806 companies generally;
1807 (B) Code Section 46-2-10, relating to payment of special fee by corporations and utilities
1808 subject to jurisdiction of commission, notice of amount due, and procedure on default;
1809 (C) Code Section 46-2-25.2, relating to sixteen-mile toll-free telephone calling,
1810 modification of rate schedules, recovery of expenses or lost revenues by telephone
1811 companies, and rate-making power of Public Service Commission not affected;
1812 (D) Code Section 46-2-25.3, relating to toll-free calls within 22 miles of exchange,
1813 hearings, and "net gain" defined;
1814 (E) Code Section 46-3-152, relating to jurisdiction of commission over rates, services, and
1815 practices of authority;
1816 (F) Code Section 46-4-53, relating to application to commission by gas utility for order
1817 approving utilization or operation of underground reservoir, hearing on application
1818 generally, and giving notice of hearing;
1819 (G) Code Section 46-4-54, relating to investigation by state geologist of site of proposed
1820 storage project, procedures involving state geologist, investigation of proposed storage
1821 project by director of Environmental Protection Division, procedures involving director,
1822 and investigation of proposed storage project by commission;
1823 (H) Code Section 46-4-60, relating to adoption by Board of Natural Resources of rules and
1824 regulations governing construction, installation, utilization, and operation of underground
S. B. 153
- 71 -

25 LC 39 4444
1825 reservoirs and stations, wells, fixtures, and other facilities, enforcement of rules and
1826 regulations, and inspection and examination;
1827 (I) Code Section 46-4-122, relating to exemption from regulation by Public Service
1828 Commission;
1829 (J) Code Section 46-4A-12, relating to construction of chapter regarding provision of
1830 energy conservation assistance to residential customers by electric and gas utilities;
1831 (K) Code Section 46-5-6, relating to exclusive power and authority of the Public Service
1832 Commission to prescribe rules and regulations regarding public pay telephones;
1833 (L) Code Section 46-5-41, relating to obtaining of certificate of public convenience and
1834 necessity for construction, operation, acquisition, or extension of telephone lines, plants,
1835 or systems;
1836 (M) Code Section 46-5-124, relating to guidelines for implementing a state-wide
1837 emergency 9-1-1 system and training and equipment standards;
1838 (N) Code Section 46-5-126, relating to cooperation by commission and telephone industry;
1839 (O) Code Section 46-5-137, relating to powers of Public Service Commission not affected;
1840 (P) Code Section 46-5-182, relating to certification of telecommunications companies
1841 which bill for or solicit intrastate telecommunications services;
1842 (Q) Code Section 46-5-211, relating to consent of end user required for release of
1843 telephone records and law enforcement exception;
1844 (R) Code Section 46-5-213, relating to circumstances to which this article not applicable
1845 regarding disclosure of certain customer information;
1846 (S) Code Section 46-5-222, relating to commission has no authority over setting of rates
1847 or terms and conditions for the offering of broadband service, voice over Internet protocol,
1848 or wireless service and limitations;
1849 (T) Code Section 46-8-73, relating to contents of petition for dissolution, certification
1850 resolution recommending dissolution, attachment of resolution to petition, verification of
1851 petition, and fee for filing petition;
S. B. 153
- 72 -

25 LC 39 4444
1852 (U) Code Section 46-8-75, relating to transfer of copy of petition from Secretary of State
1853 to commission;
1854 (V) Code Section 46-8-78, relating to order of Secretary of State accepting surrender of
1855 charter and franchises and dissolving corporation and recording of petition, certificate of
1856 approval, certificate of publication, and order by Secretary of State;
1857 (W) Code Section 46-8-196, relating to use of standard signs for highway crossings and
1858 for advertising or other purposes, mutilation, destruction, and defacement of standard signs,
1859 and removal of unauthorized signs by county authorities; and
1860 (X) Code Section 46-8A-2, relating to line or system permit required regarding rapid rail
1861 passenger service.
1862 SECTION 47.
1863 Reserved.
1864 SECTION 48.
1865 Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to revenue and taxation, is
1866 amended in:
1867 (1) Code Section 48-5-7.6, relating to preferential assessment for brownfield property, in
1868 division (h)(1)(B)(iii), by redesignating the second subdivision (II) as subdivision (III).
1869 (2) Code Section 48-5-28, relating to priority of taxes over other claims and superiority of
1870 security deed, in subsection (a), by replacing "Code Section 53-7-91," with "Code
1871 Section 53-7-40,".
1872 (3) Code Section 48-5-164, relating to duties of successor tax collector or tax commissioner
1873 as to performing uncompleted duties of outgoing collector or commissioner, distribution of
1874 commissions, and liability, by revising subsection (b) as follows:
1875 "(b)(1) Each tax collector or tax commissioner to whom a list is furnished as provided in
1876 subsection (a) of this Code section shall pay to the outgoing tax collector or tax
S. B. 153
- 73 -

25 LC 39 4444
1877 commissioner, as the taxes are collected, one-half of the commissions and retain for his or
1878 her services one-half, the commissions to be calculated as if the amounts had been
1879 collected by the outgoing tax collector or tax commissioner.
1880 (2) Reserved."
1881 (4) Code Section 48-7-27, relating to computation of taxable net income, at the end of
1882 subparagraph (a)(3)(A), by replacing the period with a semicolon, in paragraph (a)(3), by
1883 deleting the subparagraph (A) designation and by redesignating subparagraph (B) as
1884 paragraph (a)(3.1), and in division (a)(5)(D)(i), by deleting "or" at the end.
1885 (5) Code Section 48-7-29.20, relating to tax credits for contributions to rural hospital
1886 organizations, in subparagraph (e)(2)(E), by replacing "section including" with "section,
1887 including", in subparagraph (e)(4)(B), by replacing "their approval" with "such approval",
1888 and in the introductory language of subsection (i), by inserting "public" preceding "website:".
1889 (6) Code Section 48-7-40.22, relating to tax credits for business enterprises that purchase or
1890 lease a motor vehicle to provide transportation for employees, in the table in subsection (b),
1891 under Tier 2, Credit amount per vehicle, by replacing "2000.00" with "2,000.00".
1892 (7) Code Section 48-7-40.26, relating to tax credits for film, gaming, video, or digital
1893 production, in the undesignated text at the end of subparagraph (c)(2)(B), by replacing
1894 "paragraph" with "subparagraph" and in subparagraph (l)(5)(C), by inserting "public"
1895 preceding "website".
1896 (8) Code Section 48-7-40.30, relating to tax credits for certain qualified investments for
1897 limited period of time, in paragraph (f)(5), by replacing "transferrable" with "transferable".
1898 (9) Code Section 48-8-2, relating to definitions regarding state sales and use tax, in the
1899 introductory language of paragraph (39), by replacing "voice over internet protocol" with
1900 "Voice over Internet Protocol".
1901 (10) Code Section 48-8-15, relating to ratification of Executive Order on temporary and
1902 partial exemption for liquid propane gas commodity sold and delivered for residential
1903 heating, in subsection (e), by replacing "Chapter 10" with "Chapter 1".
S. B. 153
- 74 -

25 LC 39 4444
1904 (11) Code Section 48-13-133, relating to promulgation of rules and regulations regarding
1905 taxation of consumer fireworks, by replacing "this Code section" with "this article".
1906 SECTION 49.
1907 Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to social services, is amended
1908 in:
1909 (1) Code Section 49-3-6, relating to functions of county department of family and children
1910 services, in paragraph (a)(4), by replacing "Council of Accountability Courts" with "Council
1911 of Accountability Court Judges" and in subsection (b), by replacing "Board of Human
1912 Services," with "board,".
1913 (2) Code Section 49-4-159.2, relating to remote maternal health clinical services, reporting,
1914 and termination, in subparagraph (a)(1)(A), by replacing "transmitting" with "transmit" and
1915 in subsection (c), by replacing "repealed" with "repealed and reserved".
1916 (3) Code Section 49-5-8, relating to powers and duties of the Department of Human
1917 Services, in subparagraph (a)(11)(A), by replacing "with, a photograph of himself or herself,
1918 provided however, that if" with "with a photograph of himself or herself; provided, however,
1919 that, if" and in subparagraph (a)(11)(B), by replacing "a personal identification card" with
1920 "an identification card" each time the phrase appears.
1921 SECTION 50.
1922 Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state government, is amended
1923 in:
1924 (1) Article 2 of Chapter 8, relating to regional commissions, by deleting the Part 1
1925 designation.
1926 (2) Code Section 50-18-160, relating to individuals or nonprofit organizations, in
1927 paragraph (a)(1), by replacing "Code, has" with "Code or has" and in paragraph (b)(2), by
1928 replacing "in possession" with "in the possession".
S. B. 153
- 75 -

25 LC 39 4444
1929 (3) Code Section 50-36-4, relating to submission of annual immigration compliance report,
1930 creation of reporting system, contents of reports, and annual review, in paragraph (d)(7), by
1931 replacing "42-4-11.4, 42-4-11.5," with "42-1-11.4, 42-1-11.5,".
1932 SECTION 51.
1933 Title 51 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to torts, is amended in:
1934 (1) Code Section 51-1-22.1, relating to liability of an operator of a vessel under certain
1935 conditions, in paragraph (c)(1), by replacing "$1,000,000.00" with "$1 million".
1936 SECTION 52.
1937 Reserved.
1938 SECTION 53.
1939 Reserved.
1940 SECTION 54.
1941 (a) In accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 28-9-5, the following portions
1942 included in the Official Code of Georgia Annotated published under authority of the state by
1943 LEXIS Publishing, including all 2024 supplements and revised volumes thereof, are hereby
1944 reenacted, and such reenactment shall have the effect of adopting and giving force and effect
1945 of law to the following portions as contained in such supplements and volumes:
1946 (1) Statutory text; and
1947 (2) Arrangement and numbering system, including, but not limited to, title, chapter, article,
1948 part, subpart, Code section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, division, and subdivision
1949 numbers and designations.
1950 (b) The following portions included in the Official Code of Georgia Annotated published
1951 under authority of the state by LEXIS Publishing, including all 2024 supplements and revised
S. B. 153
- 76 -

25 LC 39 4444
1952 volumes thereof, are specifically not enacted or reenacted, have no binding authority, bear
1953 no weight or effect, and shall not be construed to have the imprimatur of the General
1954 Assembly or the State of Georgia:
1955 (1) Case annotations;
1956 (2) Research references, including, but not limited to:
1957 (A) Law reviews;
1958 (B) Collateral references to secondary sources;
1959 (C) Opinions of the Georgia Attorney General;
1960 (D) Advisory opinions of the State Bar; and
1961 (E) Cross-references;
1962 (3) Captions;
1963 (4) Catchlines;
1964 (5) Headings;
1965 (6) Title and chapter analyses;
1966 (7) History lines;
1967 (8) Repeal lines;
1968 (9) Editorial notes;
1969 (10) Amendment notes;
1970 (11) Code Commission notes;
1971 (12) Effective date notes;
1972 (13) Tables;
1973 (14) User's Guide;
1974 (15) General Index;
1975 (16) Volume indices;
1976 (17) Indices related to local and special laws;
1977 (18) Conversion tables;
1978 (19) The United States Constitution;
S. B. 153
- 77 -

25 LC 39 4444
1979 (20) The Georgia Constitution;
1980 (21) Rules and regulations of state agencies, departments, boards, commissions, or other
1981 entities;
1982 (22) Material in brackets or parentheses and editorial, delayed effective date, effect of
1983 amendment, or other similar notes within the text of a Code section which have been added
1984 by the publisher in order to explain or to prevent a misapprehension concerning the
1985 contents of the Code section; and
1986 (23) Any other matter published in the Official Code of Georgia Annotated which is not
1987 included in subsection (a) of this section.
1988 (c) The reenactment of the portions of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated by
1989 subsection (a) of this section shall not affect, supersede, or repeal any Act of the General
1990 Assembly, or portion thereof, which is not contained in the Official Code of Georgia
1991 Annotated and which was not repealed by Code Section 1-1-10, specifically including those
1992 Acts which have not yet been included in the text of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated
1993 because of effective dates which extend beyond the effective date of the Code or the
1994 publication date of the Code or its supplements. This subsection shall not apply to any Act
1995 or portion thereof which was superseded due to conflict as provided by subsection (b) of
1996 Code Section 28-9-5.
1997 (d) The provisions contained in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and in the other Acts
1998 enacted at the 2024 regular session of the General Assembly of Georgia shall supersede the
1999 provisions of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated ratified and reenacted by subsection (a)
2000 of this section.
2001 (e) In the event of a conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and
2002 a provision of another Act enacted at the 2025 regular session of the General Assembly, the
2003 provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1
2004 through 53 of this Act to the extent of such conflict.
S. B. 153
- 78 -

25 LC 39 4444
2005 SECTION 55.
2006 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 153
- 79 -